The Role of
Physiotherapy
in Canada.
Contributing to a Stronger Health Care System
REPORT MARCH 2017
The Role of Physiotherapy in Canada: Contributing to a Stronger
Health Care System
Novella Martinello, Abhi Bhandari, Jenny Santos, and Thy Dinh
Preface
This report is the first in a series of three that explores the role, value, and
potential of physiotherapy services in response to changing population needs
and in the context of physiotherapists’ scope of practice in Canada. This primer
report aims to provide an understanding of the role of physiotherapy in the health
care system and provides a review of various areas of practice. Subsequent
reports will include a physiotherapy market analysis and a forecast of demand
for seniors’ physiotherapy rehabilitative services in home and continuing care.
To cite this report: Martinello, Novella, Abhi Bhandari, Jenny Santos, and Thy Dinh. The Role
of Physiotherapy in Canada: Contributing to a Stronger Health Care System. Ottawa: The Conference
Board of Canada, 2017.
©2017 The Conference Board of Canada*
Published in Canada | All rights reserved | Agreement No. 40063028 | *Incorporated as AERIC Inc.
An accessible version of this document for the visually impaired is available upon request.
Accessibility Officer, The Conference Board of Canada
Tel.: 613-526-3280 or 1-866-711-2262 E-mail: accessibility@conferenceboard.ca
®The Conference Board of Canada and the torch logo are registered trademarks of The Conference
Board, Inc. Forecasts and research often involve numerous assumptions and data sources, and are subject
to inherent risks and uncertainties. This information is not intended as specific investment, accounting, legal,
or tax advice. The findings and conclusions of this report do not necessarily reflect the views of the external
reviewers, advisors, or investors. Any errors or omissions in fact or interpretation remain the sole responsibility
of The Conference Board of Canada.
© The Conference Board of Canada. All rights reserved. Please contact cboc.ca/ip with questions or concerns about the use of this material.
CONTENTS
i EXECUTIVE SUMMARY
Chapter 1
1 introduction
Chapter 2
6 the Current State of Physiotherapy in Canada
7 A Snapshot of Physiotherapy in Canada
10 Scope of Practice
12 Funding Models
13 Physiotherapist Assistants
Chapter 3
15 evolution of Physiotherapy in Canada
16 Health Promotion and Prevention
17 Healthy Aging
18 The Changing Role of Physiotherapy
Chapter 4
19 20 36 A Review of Physiotherapy Areas of Practice
Areas of Physiotherapy Practice in Canada
Health Promotion and Injury Prevention Initiatives in Primary Health Care
40 Rehabilitative Services for Seniors
Chapter 5
43 Conclusion and Next Steps
Appendix A
45 Bibliography
Appendix B
64 Methodology
•
•
•
Acknowledgements
This report was researched and written by Novella Martinello, Abhi Bhandari,
Jenny Santos, and Thy Dinh of The Conference Board of Canada.
The authors would like to thank Kate O’Connor, Melissa Anderson, and Chantal
Lauzon of the Canadian Physiotherapy Association for their guidance, support,
and contributions.
We are grateful to Dr. Ivy Lynn Bourgeault, Professor, Telfer School of
Management at the University of Ottawa, and Canadian Institutes of Health
Research Chair in Gender, Work and Health Human Resources, for her external
review, and Carole Stonebridge of The Conference Board of Canada for her
internal review.
The Canadian Physiotherapy Association and the Canadian Alliance for
Sustainable Health Care provided research funding.
The findings and conclusions of this report do not necessarily reflect the views of
the investors or reviewers. Any errors or omissions in fact or interpretation remain
the sole responsibility of The Conference Board of Canada.
About the Canadian Alliance for Sustainable Health Care
The Canadian Alliance for Sustainable Health Care (CASHC) was created to
provide Canadian business leaders and policy-makers with insightful, forward-
looking, quantitative analysis of the sustainability of the Canadian health care
system and all of its facets.
The work of the Alliance is to help Canadians better understand the conditions
under which Canada’s health care system is sustainable—financially and in a
broader sense.
These conditions include the financial aspects, institutional and private firm-
level performance, and the volunteer sector. CASHC publishes evidence-based,
accessible, and timely reports on key health and health care systems issues.
Research is arranged under these three major themes:
Population Health
The Structure of the Health Care System
Workplace Health and Wellness
Launched in May 2011, CASHC actively engages private and public sector
leaders from the health and health care sectors in developing its research
agenda. Some 33 companies and organizations have invested in the initiative,
providing invaluable financial, leadership, and expert support.
For more information about CASHC, and to sign up to receive notification of new
releases, visit the CASHC website at www.conferenceboard.ca/CASHC.
© The Conference Board of Canada. All rights reserved. Please contact cboc.ca/ip with questions or concerns about the use of this material.
CASHC Member Organizations
Champion Level
Ontario Ministry of Health and Long-Term Care
Lead Level
Pfizer Canada Inc.
Partner Level
Alberta Health
British Columbia Ministry of Health
Health Canada
LifeLabs Medical Laboratory
Services
Mercer (Canada) Limited
The Great-West Life
Assurance Company
Workers Compensation
of Nova Scotia
Participant Level
AbbVie Corporation
Canadian Association for
Retired Persons (CARP)
Canadian Dental Association
Canadian Medical Association
Canadian Nurses Association
Centric Health
Consumer Health Products Canada
Deloitte & Touche LLP
HealthPartners
Hoffmann-La Roche Limited
Innovative Medicines Canada
Manitoba Health
Neighbourhood Pharmacy
Association of Canada
Trillium Health Partners
Workplace Safety &
Prevention Services
© The Conference Board of Canada. All rights reserved. Please contact cboc.ca/ip with questions or concerns about the use of this material.
EXECUTIVE SUMMARY
The Role of Physiotherapy
in Canada: Contributing to a
Stronger Health Care System
•
•
•
•
At a Glance
Demand for physiotherapy services is growing along with the physiotherapy
workforce in Canada.
Population aging and the increasing burden of chronic conditions and injuries
boost demand for health human resources and, therefore, increase pressures
on health care budgets.
Physiotherapy has demonstrated effectiveness on health outcomes in all areas
of practice, from health promotion to rehabilitation for seniors.
Physiotherapists may be well positioned to address the changing health and
demographic needs in Canada through a shift from costly, acute care to
upstream solutions.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca.
The Role of PhysiotheRApy in Canada
Contributing to a Stronger Health Care System
pts have an
important role to
play in promoting
active lifestyles
and rehabilitation
for seniors.
Executive Summary
Optimizing the roles of health care professionals
can help to meet growing health care demands
and improve the sustainability of the health
care system. Physiotherapy is a key part of all
sectors of health care, from health promotion
to rehabilitation. The physiotherapy workforce
has grown since 2010, along with a demand for
physiotherapy services. An understanding of
the role of physiotherapy in the Canadian health
care system and opportunities to optimize the
role of rehabilitation within a changing health
and health care landscape is needed.
The scope of practice for physiotherapists (pts) varies across the
country, given that each Canadian provincial/territorial regulatory body
of pts is responsible for developing the scope of practice for its region.
However, in all provinces and territories, pts are given the authority
to assess physical function and musculoskeletal, neurological, and
cardiorespiratory systems and to provide therapeutic exercise programs.
The burden of chronic disease is rising in Canada, driven in part by an
aging population. pts have an important role to play in promoting active
lifestyles and rehabilitation for both seniors and the general population,
thus contributing to optimizing health system performance. Unfortunately,
a major gap in public funding models and compensation for pts across
the country includes a lack of focus on primary care and prevention.
Physiotherapy has demonstrated effectiveness in all areas of practice,
including, but not limited to, home-based services, intensive care units,
cardiovascular rehabilitation, emergency departments, chronic lung
disease, joint arthroplasty, low back pain, musculoskeletal conditions,
stroke, chronic disease, falls, urinary incontinence, and neurological
conditions. In many areas of practice, physiotherapy can increase quality
of life, improve various health outcomes, and decrease hospital length
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. ii
© The Conference Board of Canada. All rights reserved. Please contact cboc.ca/ip with questions or concerns about the use of this material.
Executive Summary | the Conference Board of Canada
of stay and future health care use among patients. pts can contribute to
creating a more efficient health care system through a focus on primary
care, injury prevention, and rehabilitation. The subsequent reports in
this series will provide further analysis of the physiotherapy profession in
Canada and an estimate of the demand for physiotherapy rehabilitative
services for seniors in home and continuing care.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. iii
© The Conference Board of Canada. All rights reserved. Please contact cboc.ca/ip with questions or concerns about the use of this material.
CHAPTER 1
Introduction
•
•
•
Chapter Summary
Optimizing the roles of health services providers in an interdisciplinary care
environment can help to meet growing health care demands and improve the
sustainability of the health care system.
Physiotherapy is a key part of all sectors of health care, from health promotion
to rehabilitation and from primary health care to long-term and continuing care,
and the demand for these services is growing.
This report discusses the role of physiotherapy in the Canadian health care
system and opportunities to optimize value in responding to changing health
care demands and priorities.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca.
The Role of PhysiotheRApy in Canada
Contributing to a Stronger Health Care System
The cost of health care services consumes a
large proportion of provincial/territorial budgets.
With the aging population and a rise in chronic
conditions and injuries, health care system
sustainability is a concern for all governments.
Canadians are concerned about their ability to receive effective and
high-quality care when they need it. One of the means to ensuring a
sustainable health care system is the effective and efficient management
of health human resources, including the optimization of interprofessional
teams and health services providers.1 The “Triple Aim” framework
developed by the Institute for Healthcare Improvement includes three
dimensions that must be pursued simultaneously in order to optimize
health system performance. They are improving the patient experience
of care (including quality and satisfaction); improving population health;
and reducing the per capita health care cost.2 The assumption is that if
organizations and communities achieve the Triple Aim, the result will be
better health outcomes at the same or lowest cost, thus resulting in a
sustainable health care system.3
The Role of Physiotherapy in Canada
Research Series
This research series includes three reports that aim to address the
following objectives:
1. provide a general understanding of the role of physiotherapy within the Canadian
health care system and serve as a primer to the subsequent reports;
2. provide a market analysis of the physiotherapist profession;
3. identify opportunities for physiotherapists in the context of changing
population needs, with a focus on seniors’ services, particularly in home and
continuing care.
1 prada, Grimes, and Slokin, Defining Health and Health Care Sustainability.
2 institute for Healthcare Improvement, The IHI Triple Aim.
3 ibid.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 2
© The Conference Board of Canada. All rights reserved. Please contact cboc.ca/ip with questions or concerns about the use of this material.
Chapter 1 | the Conference Board of Canada
Physiotherapy’s
scope of practice
is expanding
in response
to population
health demands.
Physiotherapy is an integral part of the health care system, from primary
health care to rehabilitation to providing care in the home. It is a health
profession that promotes physical activity and overall health; prevents
and rehabilitates disease, injury, and disability; and manages and
improves acute and chronic conditions, activity limitations, participation
restrictions, and physical performance through intervention and
education.4 Physiotherapy services are performed by physiotherapists
(pts) or by trained assistants directed and supervised by pts. pts are
trained to use diagnostic and assessment procedures and tools, so that
they can develop and implement specific preventive and therapeutic
courses of intervention for their patients in a variety of practice settings
and in a range of practice areas.5
As discussed in Chapter 2, physiotherapy’s scope of practice is
expanding in response to population health demands. The growing
demand for physiotherapy services has also resulted in changes in the
number of pts working in Canada. In 2014, there were more than 20,000
pts in the Canadian workforce, representing an increase of 3.2 per
cent per year since 1987, far outpacing the average annual Canadian
employment growth of 1.3 per cent.6 However, there is room for the
profession to expand further and contribute to creating a more efficient
and interdisciplinary health care system.
The aging Canadian population and a shift toward health promotion
within the Canadian health system will provide new opportunities for
physiotherapy; however, these opportunities will not come without their
challenges. When it comes to optimizing the inclusion of physiotherapy
in the Canadian health care system, regulation, funding models,
capacity issues, and service expansion constraints will all need to
be carefully considered.
The primary objective of this first report in a series of three is to provide
a snapshot of the current pt landscape within the Canadian health
care system and introduce opportunities for optimizing physiotherapists’
role, given demographic shifts and changing health care needs. These
4 Canadian Physiotherapy Association (CPA), Description of Physiotherapy in Canada.
5 ibid.
6 Canadian Institute for Health Information (Cihi), Health Workforce Database.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 3
The Role of PhysiotheRApy in Canada
Contributing to a Stronger Health Care System
findings were informed by a review of both published research and
grey literature. The subsequent reports will provide a market analysis
of the profession and estimate the demand for services in the context
of changing population needs, with a focus on continuing care.
Methodology Overview
The literature review employed a multi-method, iterative approach to identifying,
extracting, and synthesizing best evidence (namely, systematic reviews and
randomized controlled trials) on the effectiveness and value of services
delivered by pts. A search strategy was developed using a combination of key
search terms and medical subject headings (MeSH). This strategy, which can be
found in Table 1 of Appendix B, was applied to Ovid Medline7 and the Allied and
Complementary Medicine Database (AMed).8 When applied to Ovid Medline,
the search strategy returned a total of 141 articles, which were classified as
clinical trials, meta-analyses, or practice guidelines. After initial title and abstract
screening, we retained 52 articles. When applied to AMed, the search strategy
returned a total of 1,859 articles, of which 306 articles were classified as clinical
trials, meta-analyses, or practice guidelines. After initial title and abstract
screening, we retained and assessed 67 articles.
We also searched the Physiotherapy Evidence Database (pedro)9 and the
Cumulative Index to Nursing and Allied Health Literature (CinAHL)10 for
additional references to support the major areas of focus identified from
the grey literature. This search was limited to systematic reviews published
since 2010 to ensure capture of most recent evidence. From these additional
searches, we retained and assessed an additional 71 articles.
7 See http://ovidsp.ovid.com/autologin.html.
8 See www.ebscohost.com/academic/amed-the-allied-and-complementary-medicine-database.
9 See www.pedro.org.au/.
10 See https://health.ebsco.com/products/the-cinahl-database.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 4
© The Conference Board of Canada. All rights reserved. Please contact cboc.ca/ip with questions or concerns about the use of this material.
Chapter 1 | the Conference Board of Canada
In addition to these database searches, we performed branching searches from
relevant bibliographies to identify additional studies for analysis. We conducted
online searches using a combination of search terms such as “physiotherapy,”
“primary care,” “family health team,” and “Canada health care” to locate relevant
grey literature.
Two research associates reviewed the full-text version of the retained articles
and extracted relevant information into a data extraction table. The relevant
information was synthesized and is presented in tables and in narrative
discussion within this report.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 5
•
•
•
CHAPTER 2
The Current State of
Physiotherapy in Canada
Chapter Summary
The physiotherapy workforce grew by 13.5 per cent between 2010 and 2014,
with 40 per cent working in a hospital setting and the predominant area of
practice being related to the musculoskeletal system.
Scopes of practice for pts in Canada vary considerably across the country,
given that each provincial/territorial college is responsible for developing the
scope of practice for its region.
Regional variations exist in publicly funded pt services across the country,
contributing to access challenges.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca.
© The Conference Board of Canada. All rights reserved. Please contact cboc.ca/ip with questions or concerns about the use of this material.
Chapter 2 | the Conference Board of Canada
A Snapshot of Physiotherapy in Canada
According to the Canadian Institute for Health
Information (CIHI), there were 20,134 PTs
employed in the Canadian workforce in 2014,
representing a 13.5 per cent growth since
2010.1 However, when taking into account
registered PTs who are employed in other
professions, as well as registered PTs who
are unemployed, the total supply of PTs in
Canada is estimated at 20,842 in 2014.2 These
numbers reflect a surplus of just over 700 PTs
within Canada. Despite this surplus, very few
PTs—approximately 213 according to the most
recent estimates from CIHI—are unemployed.
This represents an unemployment rate of
only 1 per cent. By way of comparison, the
2014 unemployment rate was 1.5 per cent
for health occupations and 6.9 per cent for
all occupations.3
The Canadian Institute for Health Information
Health Workforce Database: Physiotherapists
The Canadian Institute for Health Information (Cihi) collects and reports data
on 30 groups of health care providers, including pts. Data for pts primarily
derive from the provincial and territorial regulatory or licensing bodies of the
health profession.4 In provinces and territories where the profession is not
regulated (i.e., Northwest Territories and Nunavut), pts register with the college
of another province or territory, which may affect the accuracy of the data.
1 Cihi, Health Workforce Database.
2 ibid.
3 ibid.
4 Cihi, Health Workforce Database Methodology Guide for Data Tables, 2014.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 7
The Role of PhysiotheRApy in Canada
Contributing to a Stronger Health Care System
The supply, demographics, distribution, and employment characteristics of pts
are collected through record-level data. pt data have been collected for nearly
10 years and the collection period ends on September 1 of each year. There
are several limitations to the pt data in this database. Record-level data were
not available for the 2014 data year. As well, the College of Physiotherapists of
Manitoba does not provide record-level data for year of birth and sex; however,
aggregate totals for age group and sex were provided by Manitoba Health for
2010 to 2014. Moreover, between 2010 and 2014, data were not available for the
Northwest Territories and Nunavut, as there are no territorial licensing bodies in
these territories.5
Chart 1 displays the distribution of employed pts by province or
territory in 2014.6 Of a total 20,134 employed pts, almost 67 per cent
were permanent employees and 19 per cent were self-employed.
The remainder were temporary (4.6 per cent) or casual (4.3 per cent)
employees. Almost two-thirds were employed full-time (62 per cent).
Most (90 per cent) employers of pts were located in urban areas
(including Whitehorse and Yellowknife in the territories).7
Chart 1
(number)
Physiotherapists, Employed Population, by Region, 2014
Yukon Territory
Newfoundland and Labrador
New Brunswick
Nova Scotia
Saskatchewan
Manitoba
Alberta
British Columbia
Quebec
Ontario
0 1,000 2,000 3,000 4,000 5,000 6,000 7,000 8,000
Sources: The Conference Board of Canada; Statistics Canada.
5 ibid.
6 Comparable data were unavailable for Prince Edward Island; data for the Northwest Territories and
Nunavut are included in the totals for neighbouring provinces.
7 Cihi, Physiotherapists, 2014.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 8
© The Conference Board of Canada. All rights reserved. Please contact cboc.ca/ip with questions or concerns about the use of this material.
Chapter 2 | the Conference Board of Canada
pts work in a number of different practice settings, such as community
health centres, education settings, fitness centres, government/health
planning agencies, hospices, hospitals, private practice (clinics or
in-home care), nursing homes/long-term care facilities, occupational
health centres, out-patient/ambulatory care clinics, prisons, rehabilitation
centres, research facilities, seniors’ residences, sports clinics, and work
sites.8 According to Cihi data, 40 per cent of pts were employed in a
hospital setting, 10 per cent in a community setting, and 32 per cent in
a private practice setting in 2014.9
pts’ area of practice in Canada is predominantly focused on the
musculoskeletal system (such as sports medicine, orthopaedics, and
rheumatology) and general practice (which focuses on general physical
health issues). (See Chart 2.) The proportion of pts practising in these
areas represents 40 and 33 per cent of the labour force, respectively.
The remaining areas of practice focus on neurological, cardiovascular,
and respiratory systems and other areas of direct services, including
health promotion and wellness.
Chart 2
Physiotherapist Workforce, by Area of Practice, 2014
(number of physiotherapists; percentage of area of practice; n = 15,551)
228 (1%) 125 (1%)
421 (3%)
131 (1%) 890 (6%)
1,016 (6%)
6,275
(40%)
1,364
(9%)
5,101
(33%)
Musculoskeletal and integumentary systems
General practice
Other areas of direct services
Neurological system
Non-clinical practice
Cardiovascular and respiratory systems
Prevention, health promotion, and wellness
Multi-system
Other
Note: Missing values are excluded (n = 225).
Source: Canadian Institute for Health Information.
8 CPA, Description of Physiotherapy in Canada.
9 the remaining values were missing.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 9
The Role of PhysiotheRApy in Canada
Contributing to a Stronger Health Care System
Educational Attainment Among PTs
Physiotherapists in Canada require a master’s degree for entry to
practice. Currently, there are 15 master’s-level physiotherapy university
programs across Canada.10 Despite the transition away from an
undergraduate education to a post-graduate education, the majority
of current pts (66.9 per cent) held a bachelor’s degree in 2014, while
just over one-quarter (26.7 per cent) held a master’s degree, 5.5 per
cent held a diploma, and 0.9 per cent held a doctorate. Of Canadian-
educated pts (excluding Northwest Territories and Nunavut), more than
one-third (34.9 per cent) of employed pts in Canada completed their
education in physiotherapy in Ontario, while 28.8 per cent completed
their education in Quebec.11
The subsequent reports in this research series will include a greater
breakdown and analysis of the physiotherapy market in Canada. This
will include a deep dive into how pts are practising and the estimated
current and projected supply and demand for services.
Scope of Practice
A profession’s scope of practice can be defined as the services in which
its practitioners are “educated, competent and authorized to provide.”12
The actual scope of practice of individual practitioners is determined
by factors such as their continuing professional education, practice
settings, workplace requirements, and patient or client needs.13 Table 2
of Appendix B visually demonstrates the Canadian physiotherapy scope
of practice by skill/activity and province/territory. Each skill/activity is
categorized as either “authorized,” “delegated,” “restricted/controlled,”
“unauthorized,” or “unknown.”
An authorized act gives pts the “authority” to practise the specified skill
or activity within that specific province. For example, in all provinces
and territories, pts are given the authority to assess physical function
and musculoskeletal, neurological, and cardiorespiratory systems.
10 11 12 13 ibid.
CPA, Description of Physiotherapy in Canada.
Cihi, Physiotherapists in Canada, 2010.
CPA, Description of Physiotherapy in Canada.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 10
© The Conference Board of Canada. All rights reserved. Please contact cboc.ca/ip with questions or concerns about the use of this material.
Chapter 2 | the Conference Board of Canada
Each Canadian
provincial/territorial
college of pts is
responsible for
developing the
scope of practice
for its region.
They are equally authorized to provide therapeutic exercise programs,
hydrotherapy, electrotherapeutic modalities, and soft tissue and manual
therapy, including massage.14 However, in provinces where certain skills
or activities are not given the same authority, pts must practise these
skills or activities under the authority of another profession. These are
known as delegated acts.15 Although delegated acts are uncommon,
there are a few instances where skills are delegated to other health
professionals—for example, setting/casting a facture or dislocation
in British Columbia and ordering x-rays and lab tests in Manitoba.
Restricted means that the performance of specific skills or acts may be
done only by regulated health professionals who are qualified to perform
them.16 In Ontario, a pt is required to roster,17 declaring they have the
knowledge and skills to perform the restricted act. Rostered activities
include tracheal suctioning, spinal manipulation, acupuncture, treating a
wound below the dermis, assessing or rehabilitating pelvic musculature,
and administering a substance by inhalation.18 Certain restrictions are
in place, including ordering tests such as magnetic resonance imaging
(MRI), diagnostic ultrasound, x-rays, and lab tests, depending on the
jurisdiction. For example, in Alberta, pts must initially be supervised by
someone who is authorized to perform restricted acts until they complete
the requirements to perform the acts independently.19 The Essential
Competency Profile for Physiotherapists in Canada provides additional
information on physiotherapy scope of practice or competencies
in Canada.20
Given that each Canadian provincial/territorial college of pts is
responsible for developing the scope of practice for its region, scopes
of practice vary across the country. For example, the ability to provide
acupuncture is restricted in Ontario and Alberta, unauthorized in
Quebec, and allowed in all other regions except Nunavut and Northwest
14 ibid.
15 ibid.
16 ibid.
17 18 19 20 Rostering requires that pts complete additional post-graduate training, demonstrate competency,
and complete ongoing testing in order to register to perform the act.
College of Physiotherapists of Ontario, Rostering for Authorized Activities/Controlled Acts.
CPA, Description of Physiotherapy in Canada.
national Physiotherapy Advisory Group, Essential Competency Profile for Physiotherapist Assistants
in Canada.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 11
The Role of PhysiotheRApy in Canada
Contributing to a Stronger Health Care System
Territories, where it is listed as unknown. Similarly, spinal manipulation
is restricted in Alberta and Ontario, authorized in Quebec with the
approval of the college, authorized in Manitoba through an approved
program but within skill level and within college competency statement,
and authorized in Saskatchewan if the pt has specialized educational
teachings or courses. Spinal manipulation is listed as unknown in
Prince Edward Island, Northwest Territories, and Nunavut. Related
to this, there are currently gaps in what is known about pt scopes of
practice across the country. For example, in Nova Scotia and Yukon,
the prescription, manufacture, modification, and application of braces,
splints, taping, mobility aids, or seating equipment and ergonomic
evaluation, modification, education, and counselling are authorized;
however, it is unclear whether pts are involved in these acts throughout
the rest of Canada.
Funding Models
How physiotherapy is publicly funded (how pts are remunerated by
government) varies across the country. For example, Alberta and Ontario
are currently the only provinces that have identified physiotherapy in
the primary health care model. Similarities across all provinces include
the availability of worker’s compensation boards and assistance to
low-income individuals and seniors through publicly funded and home-
care physiotherapy. However, challenges exist in public funding models
across Canada, including an overall lack of funding for community care,
prevention, and primary health care.
Within privately funded services, physiotherapy insurance claims
account for approximately 5.5 per cent of the total of extended
health benefits paid in Canada in 2012.21 The value of these claims
is approximately $350 million to $450 million per year. The number
of claims for physiotherapy is growing each year, as well as the cost
per physiotherapy visit. For claims to be eligible, the service must be
provided by a pt registered and in good standing with the provincial
college and may require a physician’s order. Coverage varies with
21 3D Analytics and Consulting, The Practice of Physiotherapy in Canadian Extended Health Insurance.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 12
© The Conference Board of Canada. All rights reserved. Please contact cboc.ca/ip with questions or concerns about the use of this material.
Chapter 2 | the Conference Board of Canada
individual plans. For individuals with limited or no extended health
benefits, physiotherapy is paid for out-of-pocket. It is uncertain what
proportion of all funding for physiotherapy is paid for out-of-pocket.
Claims are usually reimbursed at 80 per cent of the cost and subject to
a plan’s annual deductible.22 The lack of publicly available information
on health plans, claims, and services utilization makes it difficult to fully
understand the extent of coverage in Canada, by jurisdiction, and by
individual characteristics (e.g., socio-demographic).
Physiotherapist Assistants
Physiotherapist assistants (ptAs) are trained personnel who assist the
registered/licensed pt in providing physiotherapy services under the
pt’s direction and supervision.23 They assist the pt in ensuring the
delivery of safe, effective, and efficient physiotherapy services, while
also achieving and maintaining optimal clinical outcomes.24 Tasks and
responsibilities of the ptA may vary across Canada. Tasks are assigned
to the ptA by the supervising physiotherapist. ptAs’ level of education,
experience, and exposure to practice settings vary widely.25
Physiotherapy Education Accreditation Canada (peAC) and the
Canadian Association of Occupational Therapists are the accreditation
agencies that govern the ptA Education Accreditation Program (EAP)
and Occupational Therapist Assistant (otA) program, respectively.26
The accreditation process involves assessing candidacy status, a letter
of intent, preparing self-study reports, on-site and off-site accreditation
reviews, editing and reviewing the report, and, finally, recommendation
and decision of accreditation.27 There are currently 22 public institutions
across Canada (excluding Quebec) that offer occupational/physical
therapy assistant, rehabilitation assistant, or physiotherapist assistant
programs (or some combination); the specific number of private colleges
22 ibid.
23 national Physiotherapy Advisory Group, Essential Competency Profile for Physiotherapy Assistants
in Canada.
24 ibid.
25 ibid.
26 occupational Therapist Assistant and Physiotherapist Assistant Education Accreditation,
Accreditation Process.
27 ibid.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 13
The Role of PhysiotheRApy in Canada
Contributing to a Stronger Health Care System
offering the program is unknown.28 Accreditation is open to both public
and private programs. Accreditation is voluntary; however, it adds
credibility to the program and helps to ensure some standardization
of competencies. Currently, 17 programs have candidacy status and
14 programs have been accredited.29 A survey of Occupational Therapist
Assistant & Physiotherapist Assistant Educators Council (CopeC)
members indicated that the 13 programs that responded have graduated
approximately 1,418 otAs/ptAs across Canada in the last five years.
Members were asked to give an estimate of the employment rates of
these graduates; responses ranged from 65 to 100 per cent.
Physical rehabilitation therapists (PRTs) have a three-year diploma from
a college and are regulated health professionals in Quebec, but with a
more limited scope than a pt. A pt has previously assessed all patients
being treated by a PRT or patients have received a medical diagnosis
that is not restricted to symptoms. Section 4 of the Ordre professionnel
de la physiothérapie du Québec’s regulation guide describes the
four categories of disorders that a PRT is authorized to treat with
physiotherapy: determining or contributing to the development of the list
of possible diagnoses; setting treatment objectives and contraindications
or precautions for the patient; making decisions about the treatment
approach; and applying the treatment to the patient.30
28 occupational Therapist Assistant & Physiotherapist Assistant Education Accreditation Program,
Affiliated Education Programs.
29 ibid.
30 ordre professionnel de la physiothérapie du Québec, Section 4 of the regulation respecting.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 14
© The Conference Board of Canada. All rights reserved. Please contact cboc.ca/ip with questions or concerns about the use of this material.
CHAPTER 3
Evolution of Physiotherapy
in Canada
•
•
•
Chapter Summary
The burden of chronic conditions and injuries is rising in Canada, partly due
to population aging.
As seniors experience higher rates of chronic illness and multi-morbidity,
the demand for health care is high among this group and will continue to
grow over time.
pts have an important role to play in promoting active lifestyles and
rehabilitation for both seniors and the general population, thus contributing to
population health and wellness, while improving health system performance.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca.
The Role of PhysiotheRApy in Canada
Contributing to a Stronger Health Care System
Health Promotion and Prevention
In Canada, the impact of chronic disease
continues to drive health system change.
More than half of Canadians (16 million people)
live with chronic illness, placing enormous
pressures on the health care system.1
Since 2003, and taking age adjustments into account, we have seen
increases in the prevalence of Type 2 diabetes (24 per cent increase),
pain or discomfort that prevents activities (34 per cent increase), self-
reported mental health issues (35 per cent increase), and obesity
(23 per cent increase).2 Many of these chronic diseases can be avoided
and their symptoms lessened by the implementation of healthy, active
lifestyles, including improved physical activity and reduced sedentary
behaviour. It is regrettable, therefore, that over this same period of time,
the proportion of the population that is physically inactive in leisure time
has plateaued at around 45 per cent.3
According to a recent report by Cihi, when it comes to finding ways to
make the health system more efficient, health regions must focus on
those modifiable risk factors for ill health and their causes.4 All of this
supports a shift in focus in the health care system from tertiary and
“sick” care to health promotion and prevention efforts in order to make
the best use of health care dollars. To this end, allocating resources to
preventive measures has the potential to produce long-term cost savings
through reduced demand on health care services and represents a more
effective long-term strategy for spending scarce resources.5
1 Statistics Canada, Canadian Community Health Survey, 2003 and 2012.
2 ibid.
3 dinh, Moving Ahead.
4 Cihi, Measuring the Level and Determinants.
5 Munro, Healthy People, Healthy Performance, Healthy Profits.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 16
© The Conference Board of Canada. All rights reserved. Please contact cboc.ca/ip with questions or concerns about the use of this material.
Chapter 3 | the Conference Board of Canada
Healthy Aging
The composition of the Canadian population is changing. In 2015, nearly
one in six Canadians (16.1 per cent) were 65 years and over.6 By 2036,
the number of seniors is expected to be over 10 million—more than
double the number in 2011. This rate of growth is significantly higher
than the projected rate of overall population growth, which is expected
to increase from approximately 34 million to 44 million. Furthermore,
seniors are projected to make up around one-quarter of all Canadians
by the middle of the century.7
Seniors are the most frequent and intense users of the health care
system, as more than three-quarters of them have at least one chronic
condition. Seniors suffer from a larger number of chronic diseases, take
more prescription and over-the-counter medications than any other age
group, and require ongoing treatment and management.8
Healthy aging is the process of developing and maintaining functional
abilities that enable well-being in older age.9 Seniors can increase
their well-being by participating in programs and care that encourage
a healthy, active lifestyle. Seniors increasingly participate in their own
health care, and Canadian communities are beginning to understand the
importance of providing age-friendly environments and opportunities for
seniors to make healthy decisions. For example, in Ontario, many family
health teams offer programs to help seniors, such as aging at home and
fall prevention. Family health teams are being developed that are tailored
to meet specific local community needs, emphasizing comprehensive
chronic disease management and health promotion strategies.10
6 Statistics Canada, CANSIM table 051-0001.
7 Statistics Canada, Population Projections for Canada, 46, 55.
8 Verbeeten, Astles, and Prada, Understanding Health and Social Services for Seniors in Canada.
9 World Health Organization, World Report on Ageing and Health.
10 ibid.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 17
The Role of PhysiotheRApy in Canada
Contributing to a Stronger Health Care System
The Changing Role of Physiotherapy
The role of physiotherapy within Canada has the potential to change
due to the aging population, increased levels of physical inactivity, and
the associated burden of chronic conditions and injuries. pts may be
well positioned to address the changing health and population needs
within Canada since they have the capacity to assess physical function
and prescribe exercise programs and are in a strong position to provide
enhanced individualized services and treatment for seniors, including
programs aimed at health promotion and injury prevention. As such, pts
have an important role to play in encouraging healthy, active living and
maintaining mobility, not only among seniors but also among the overall
population. pts can play a part in optimizing health system performance
through an increased focus on upstream solutions and redirecting
patients from costly acute health care and emergency departments
toward timely, accessible, and affordable community services. This could
significantly reduce pressures on provincial health care budgets and
improve the patient experience.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 18
© The Conference Board of Canada. All rights reserved. Please contact cboc.ca/ip with questions or concerns about the use of this material.
CHAPTER 4
A Review of Physiotherapy
Areas of Practice
•
•
•
Chapter Summary
Physiotherapy has demonstrated effectiveness in a wide variety of practice areas.
Physiotherapy can increase quality of life and improve functionality and other
health outcomes while decreasing hospital visits, lengths of stay, and other costly
acute and continuing care services.
The increasing burden of chronic conditions and injuries as a result of population
aging warrants a focus on the value of physiotherapy in specific service areas,
including primary health care and seniors’ health initiatives as promising areas
of practice for new graduates.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca.
The Role of PhysiotheRApy in Canada
Contributing to a Stronger Health Care System
Areas of Physiotherapy Practice in Canada
This section provides an overview of
physiotherapy’s areas of practice within
Canada as described in a recent CPA report.1
These areas include pediatrics, home-based
services, intensive care units, emergency care,
chronic diseases, cardiovascular rehabilitation,
chronic lung disease, neurological conditions,
stroke, musculoskeletal conditions, low back
pain, joint arthroplasty, falls, and urinary
incontinence, to name a few. Additionally, this
section highlights recent, high-quality evidence
(i.e., systematic reviews and randomized
controlled trials) of the effectiveness of each
of the aforementioned areas.
Pediatrics
Pediatric pts assess, diagnose, and treat children with neurological,
developmental, cardiorespiratory, and orthopaedic conditions to improve
their function and independence.2 The costs associated with pediatric
physiotherapy services are generally higher than for adult treatments.
However, these services have been found to result in long-term health
benefits and decreased use of future health care services.3 Studies
have found effectiveness of physiotherapy for pediatric patients with
various conditions. For example, aerobic and strength training and
other structured exercise programs have been shown to significantly
improve pulmonary function for children with cystic fibrosis;4 improve
strength of selected muscle groups, gross motor function, endurance,
1 Mitton and Dionne, Valuation of Physiotherapy Services in Canada.
2 CPA, Pediatrics.
3 ibid.
4 Van Doorn, “Exercise Programs for Children With Cystic Fibrosis.”
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 20
© The Conference Board of Canada. All rights reserved. Please contact cboc.ca/ip with questions or concerns about the use of this material.
Chapter 4 | the Conference Board of Canada
and temperospatial measures in children with cerebral palsy;5 decrease
disability in adulthood, improve quality of life and functional abilities
in children with juvenile idiopathic arthritis;6 and reduce fatigue and
improve strength and quality for children with cancer.7 For children
with disabilities, pediatric physical therapists can improve day-to-day
functioning by measuring and promoting meaningful outcomes in the
individual, family, and environment components.8 Lastly, for pre-term
infants, physical therapy interventions are effective, but they need to
be tailored to the infant’s age, condition, and individual characteristics.9
Other studies found that exercise interventions during childhood increase
annual bone mineral content and areal bone mineral density;10 improve
vascular function;11 and reduce waist circumference, percentage of body
fat, and visceral fat.12 More generally, studies on school-based physical
activity interventions suggest that short bouts of high-intensity weight-
bearing activity can positively affect growing pediatric bone and in some
cases also improve lean and fat tissue.13 Notably, pts in pediatric care
form a close bond with their patient and the patient’s family and play
an important role in the transition to adult care, especially within an
interprofessional team. For example, pts can support the management
of perinatal conditions, injuries, and other conditions diagnosed in
early childhood.14
Home-Based Services
Home-based physiotherapy services provide assessment and treatment
to individuals in their homes for many conditions, including, stroke, heart
failure, Parkinson’s disease, and recovery from hip-replacement surgery.15
Home-based physiotherapy has been shown to improve overall physical
5 Martin, Baker, and Harvey, “A Systematic Review of Common Physiotherapy Interventions.”
6 Long and Rouster-Stevens, “The Role of Exercise Therapy.”
7 Baumann, Bloch, and Buelertz, “Clinical Exercise Interventions in Pediatric Oncology.”
8 Carey and Long, “The Pediatric Physical Therapist’s Role.”
9 Javier, Conesa, and Pérez-López, “Efficacy of Early Physiotherapy Intervention.”
10 Specker, Thiex, and Sudhagoni, “Does Exercise Influence Pediatric Bone?”
11 dias and others, “Exercise and Vascular Function in Child Obesity.”
12 Alberga and others, “A Review of Randomized Controlled Trials of Aerobic Exercise Training.”
13 nogueira, Weeks, and Beck, “Exercise to Improve Pediatric Bone and Fat.”
14 Mitton and Dionne, Valuation of Physiotherapy Services in Canada.
15 ibid.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 21
The Role of PhysiotheRApy in Canada
Contributing to a Stronger Health Care System
Home-based
programs are
more cost-effective
than in-patient
treatment.
well-being, decreases social isolation among clients, and reduces the
rate of rehospitalization and future health care service utilization.16
Further, home-based physiotherapy interventions, such as tailored
exercise and inspiratory muscle training, have been shown to be
effective in improving breathlessness during activities of daily living
for patients with severe chronic obstructive pulmonary disease
(Copd).17 There is strong evidence that home-based interventions
provide significant relief in dyspnea status and index and improve
health‑related quality of life, exercise capacity, and pulmonary function.18
These programs also significantly improve quality of life and systolic
blood pressure and decrease smoking and depression among those
with more than one main coronary heart disease risk factor, as compared
to usual care.19 Other types of physiotherapy interventions for patients
with Copd are highlighted in the section Chronic Lung Disease.
As well, home-based exercise programs can help prevent falls and
frailty20 and improve physical activity, balance, mobility, and muscle
strength in seniors.21 New research has found that physical therapy
through an in-home video telerehabilitation program significantly
improved functional outcomes and health-related quality of life for a
group of veterans.22 Overall, the research supports home-based services
provided by pts to improve functional activities for both seniors living in
the community with chronic disease23 and those who are healthy, with
smaller improvements for the latter.24 Although home care can be less
available than in-patient treatment due to long wait times and high costs,
home-based programs are more cost-effective than in-patient treatment.
This is due to decreased future health care use and the provision
16 CPA, Home-Based Physiotherapy.
17 18 19 20 thomas and others,” The Impact of Home-Based Physiotherapy Interventions on Breathlessness.”
Liu and others, “Effectiveness of Home-Based Pulmonary Rehabilitation.”
Mitton and Dionne, Valuation of Physiotherapy Services in Canada.
Clegg and others, “Do Home-Based Exercise Interventions Improve Outcomes for Frail Older
People?”
21 22 23 hill and others, “Individualized Home-Based Exercise Programs for Older People to Reduce Falls.”
Levy and others, “Effects of Physical Therapy Delivery Via Home Video Telerehabilitation.”
health Quality Ontario, “In-Home Care for Optimizing Chronic Disease Management in the
Community.”
24 thiebaud, Funk, and Abe, “Home-Based Resistance Training for Older Adults.”
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 22
© The Conference Board of Canada. All rights reserved. Please contact cboc.ca/ip with questions or concerns about the use of this material.
Chapter 4 | the Conference Board of Canada
of seamless care between hospital and home.25 Clearly, this area of
practice requires pts with broad experiences who are comfortable
working independently.26
Intensive Care Units
pt treatment in the intensive care unit (ICU) focuses on early mobility
of critically ill patients and respiratory management of ventilator-
dependent patients.27 In this setting, pts assess and manage a variety
of patient complications affecting the neurological, musculoskeletal,
and cardiorespiratory systems.28 As a member of the multidisciplinary
team, they assist with patient positioning and mobilization, including
through exercises focused on strengthening muscles, increasing
balance, and increasing range of motion.29 Physiotherapy in the ICU has
been shown to improve outcomes, decrease hospital stay length, and
improve quality of life among patients.30 A systematic review of pts in
pediatric ICU supports the use of the expiratory flow increase technique
and cardiorespiratory physiotherapy, especially manual hyperinflation
and vibrations, for secretion clearance.31 There is also evidence that
inspiratory muscle training in the ICU facilitates weaning and reduces
the length of time on non-invasive ventilation after weaning and length
of stay in the ICU and hospital.32 One systematic review showed that
the only effective intervention to improve long-term physical functioning
among ICU survivors is exercise/physical therapy when compared to
other interventions such as nutrition and nurse-led follow-up.33 Another
systematic review showed that early rehabilitation in the pediatric ICU
has short- and long-term benefits, and that it’s both safe and feasible.34
Specifically, physiotherapy care in the ICU contributed to a reduction
in the length of stay, mechanical ventilation support, incidence of
25 26 ibid.
Mitton and Dionne, Valuation of Physiotherapy Services in Canada.
27 CPA, Intensive Care Unit.
28 ibid.
29 30 31 32 33 34 denehy and Berney, “Physiotherapy in the Intensive Care Unit.”
Mitton and Dionne, Valuation of Physiotherapy Services in Canada.
hawkins and Jones, “What Is the Role of the Physiotherapist in Paediatric Intensive Care Units?”
elkins and Dentice, “Inspiratory Muscle Training Facilitates Weaning From Mechanical Ventilation.”
Calvo-Ayala and others, “Interventions to Improve the Physical Function of ICU Survivors.”
Wieczorek and others, “Early Mobilization in the Pediatric Intensive Care Unit.”
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 23
The Role of PhysiotheRApy in Canada
Contributing to a Stronger Health Care System
respiratory infection, and risk of mortality.35 Overall, although patients
in the ICU do not always receive physical therapy as a standard of
care, research shows that early exercise in the ICU helps prevent
neuromuscular complications and improves functional status; it is
effective, safe, and feasible.36,37 Nevertheless, physical rehabilitation
must be tailored to the patient’s impairment to be effective.38 pts assist
with service collaboration; however, there are challenges reported
with high caseloads, staff shortages, patient buy-in, and the need for
specialized equipment. Further commitment from hospitals, appropriate
funding models, and increased education for clients is needed to
address these issues.
Emergency
The main function of pts in the emergency department (ed) is to assess
mobility and function.39 Specifically, they assess, diagnose, triage, and
manage patients with musculoskeletal injuries and elderly patients with
reduced functionality. Physiotherapy in eds has high patient satisfaction40
and improves the continuum of care through assisting with referrals and
discharge planning. Studies have highlighted physiotherapy care in the
ed context as one mechanism to improve pain control, reduce short-term
disability, and decrease hospital length of stay and wait times.41 Although
there are many interventions that have been reported to improve pain
management in eds, there is not enough evidence to recommend any
specific intervention for widespread implementation and adoption.42
Additionally, early identification of and support for patients requiring
physiotherapy can decrease future burden on health services; however,
challenges remain with service expansion—more beds are required, yet
many emergency departments already operate at full capacity.43
35 36 37 38 ibid.
Castro and others, “Chest Physiotherapy Effectiveness to Reduce Hospitalization.”
Stiller, “Physiotherapy in Intensive Care.”
Sosnowski and others, “Early Rehabilitation in the Intensive Care Unit.”
39 CPA, Emergency Department.
40 taylor and others, “Primary Contact Physiotherapy in Emergency Departments Can Reduce Length
of Stay.”
41 42 43 peiris, Taylor, and Shields, “Extra Physical Therapy Reduces Length of Stay.”
Sampson, Goodacre, and O’Cathain, “Interventions to Improve the Management of Pain.”
Mitton and Dionne, Valuation of Physiotherapy Services in Canada.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 24
© The Conference Board of Canada. All rights reserved. Please contact cboc.ca/ip with questions or concerns about the use of this material.
Chapter 4 | the Conference Board of Canada
Chronic Diseases
Physiotherapy is effective for the prevention, treatment, management,
and education of self-management of chronic disease, including
hypertension, emphysema, Copd, Type 2 diabetes, and obesity.44
For example, a recent systematic review found that pts make moderate
contributions to self-management interventions that are disease-specific
by applying behaviour change theories.45 More generally, there is strong
evidence that physical activity should be used as a tool in preventing and
managing chronic diseases.46 Specific evidence on the effectiveness of
physiotherapy in patients with Copd is highlighted in the next section,
Cardiovascular Rehabilitation.
While more research is needed on cost-effectiveness in the area of
physiotherapy and chronic diseases, we do know that physiotherapy
requires minimal equipment and that most pts have expertise in chronic
disease prevention/management.47 Generally, future use of health care
resources is reduced through chronic disease prevention programs that
have elements of exercise, education, and self-management strategies.48
One Canadian study shows that being physically active reduces a
person’s lifetime probability of developing Type 2 diabetes by 43 per cent,
hypertension by 26 per cent, and osteoporosis by 36 per cent. Physical
activity also reduces the risk of developing potentially deadly conditions
such as colon cancer (27 per cent), breast cancer (17 per cent), heart
disease (30 per cent), and stroke (29 per cent).49 Physical inactivity
accounts for a significant portion of health care spending in Canada.50
Regrettably, referral patterns, lack of resources, and support for lower-
income individuals are the main barriers to this area of practice.
44 CPA, Chronic Disease.
45 46 Richardson and others, “Self-Management Interventions for Chronic Disease.”
Adami and others, “The Role of Physical Activity in the Prevention and Treatment
of Chronic Diseases.”
47 Mitton and Dionne, Valuation of Physiotherapy Services in Canada.
48 CPA, Chronic Disease.
49 Janssen, “Health Care Costs of Physical Inactivity in Canadian Adults.”
50 ibid.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 25
The Role of PhysiotheRApy in Canada
Contributing to a Stronger Health Care System
Cardiovascular Rehabilitation
Cardiac rehabilitation (CR) is a team-based intervention that has a
holistic approach to improving individual outcomes after a cardiac event;
it includes physical, psychosocial, and educational components.51 pts
have a central role in CR programs, including prescribing individualized
exercise programs and contributing to education programs on lifestyle
changes such as smoking cessation.52 Physiotherapy for CR is cost-
effective and proven effective in reducing hospitalization rates, improving
health outcomes, and changing lifestyle behaviours.53 For example, one
large review found that exercise-based CR decreased cardiovascular
mortality and hospital admissions and improved quality of life for those
with coronary heart disease.54
Another study showed evidence that exercise-based CR for those with
post-myocardial infarction had a lower risk of a secondary event and
all-cause mortality.55 Cardiovascular exercise may also be beneficial for
stroke survivors during sub-acute stages to improve aerobic capacity
and walking distance.56 However, participation and adherence to cardiac
rehabilitation programs remains a challenge, especially among the
elderly. Education and referral strategies can assist with improving
uptake and adherence rates.57
Chronic Lung Disease
Similarly, pulmonary rehabilitation (PR) for patients with chronic lung
disease are comprehensive, multidisciplinary, patient-centred programs
that incorporate exercise training and self-management education as
well as interventions that focus on psychosocial and nutritional health.58
PR has been shown to improve patient outcomes and to decrease
ed and physician visits. While there may be some issues in terms of
51 CPA, Cardiac Rehabilitation.
52 Mitton and Dionne, Valuation of Physiotherapy Services in Canada.
53 ibid.
54 55 Anderson and others, “Exercise-Based Cardiac Rehabilitation for Coronary Heart Disease.”
Lawler, Filion, and Eisenberg, “Efficacy of Exercise-Based Cardiac Rehabilitation Post-Myocardial
Infarction.”
56 57 Stoller and others, “Effects of Cardiovascular Exercise Early After Stroke.”
Mitton and Dionne, Valuation of Physiotherapy Services in Canada.
58 CPA, Chronic Lung Disease.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 26
© The Conference Board of Canada. All rights reserved. Please contact cboc.ca/ip with questions or concerns about the use of this material.
Chapter 4 | the Conference Board of Canada
Physiotherapy
can decrease
medication use,
which suggests
cost-effectiveness.
maintaining effectiveness, studies have shown that exercise therapy
improves outcomes for patients with cystic fibrosis and physiotherapy
can decrease medication use and number of ICU admissions over time,
which suggests cost-effectiveness compared to usual care.59 A review
showed that an out-patient pulmonary rehabilitation program not only led
to significant improvements in dyspnea, exercise capacity, and quality
of life,60 but also reduced health resources use in those with severe
Copd.
61,62 PR is also safe for people with interstitial lung disease with
similar improvements, but its longer-term effects for these patients are
yet to be ascertained. Likewise, another review showed that exercise
capacity was improved and pulmonary function was maintained following
lung resection surgery with pre-operative physiotherapy, but it was
not clear whether these benefits led to a reduction in post-operative
pulmonary complications.63
As for effectiveness on the specific skills performed by pts, a very
recent systematic review shows evidence that spinal manipulative
therapy improves lung function and exercise function for those with
Copd; however, more research is needed due to study limitations.64
Cardiorespiratory physiotherapy techniques, such as intermittent positive
pressure ventilation and positive expiratory pressure, and a walking
program are also effective for patients who require assistance with
sputum clearance.65
Other research indicates that physiotherapy may improve aerobic
capacity, disease-specific quality of life,66 cardiopulmonary fitness,
and inspiratory pressure while reducing symptoms and medication
use for patients with asthma.67 Likewise, chronic disease management
59 60 61 62 63 64 65 66 67 Mitton and Dionne, Valuation of Physiotherapy Services in Canada.
nellessen, Hernandes, and Pitta, “Physiotherapy and Rehabilitative Interventions in Patients With
Chronic Respiratory Disease.”
Rubi and others, “Effectiveness of Pulmonary Rehabilitation in Reducing Health Resources Use.”
ochmann, Jörres, and Nowak, “Long-Term Efficacy of Pulmonary Rehabilitation.”
nagarajan and others, “Is Preoperative Physiotherapy/Pulmonary Rehabilitation Beneficial?”
Wearing and others, “The Use of Spinal Manipulative Therapy in the Management of Chronic
Obstructive Pulmonary Disease.”
tanf, Taylor, and Blackstock, “Chest Physiotherapy for Patients Admitted to Hospital.”
Crosbie, “The Effect of Physical Training in Children With Asthma.”
Bruurs, Van der Giessen, and Moed, “The Effectiveness of Physiotherapy in Patients With Asthma.”
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 27
The Role of PhysiotheRApy in Canada
Contributing to a Stronger Health Care System
programs for adults with asthma improve asthma-specific quality of life,
asthma severity, and lung function tests.68
Despite these potential benefits, challenges exist in physiotherapy
uptake and completion rates, as a result of a lack of perceived benefit,
poor transportation to service centres, and lack of additional capacity
of physiotherapy programs for chronic lung disease.69 A holistic approach
to identifying the key issues influencing a patient’s participation must
include environmental, organizational, and individual factors.70
Neurological Conditions
Another subpopulation that requires specialized care is those with
neurological conditions. Since the incidence of some of the more
common neurological conditions increases with age, as our population
ages and grows, both the number of individuals facing the challenges
associated with neurological conditions and the cost of caring for these
individuals are expected to rise. Physiotherapy interventions have
shown benefits for individuals with neurological conditions, including
for individuals with Parkinson’s disease. For example, one review
found that physiotherapy improved gait outcomes of velocity, two-or-
six-minute walk test, and step length, as well as functional mobility and
balance outcomes over the short term more than placebo (control) or
no physiotherapy intervention.71 Other research also supports the use
of exercise training to improve balance and gait ability and prevent falls
in people with Parkinson’s disease.72 However, there is not enough
evidence to demonstrate the effectiveness of one physiotherapy
intervention versus another in this population.73
It was also found that physiotherapy in dementia treatment not only helps
to improve functional abilities, but also helps to maintain or improve
68 69 70 71 72 73 peytremann-Bridevaux and others, “Chronic Disease Management Programmes for Adults
With Asthma.”
Mitton and Dionne, Valuation of Physiotherapy Services in Canada.
Johnston and Grimmer-Somers, “Pulmonary Rehabilitation.”
tomlinson and others, “Physiotherapy Versus Placebo or No Intervention in Parkinson’s Disease.”
Shen, Wong-Yu, and Mak, “Effects of Exercise on Falls, Balance, and Gait Ability in
Parkinson’s Disease.”
tomlinson and others, “Physiotherapy for Parkinson’s Disease.”
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 28
© The Conference Board of Canada. All rights reserved. Please contact cboc.ca/ip with questions or concerns about the use of this material.
Chapter 4 | the Conference Board of Canada
Physiotherapy
interventions
significantly
improve functional
outcomes.
cognitive abilities.74 Exercise programs, in general, may also be effective
in preventing falls in community-dwelling seniors with dementia and other
cognitive impairment.75,76 However, the true benefits and longer-term
impact is realized only if and when the patient develops the skills and
strategies for long-term adherence to appropriate exercise.77
Among people with schizophrenia, another systematic review found
that physiotherapy interventions such as aerobic exercises improved
psychiatric symptoms and quality of life and reduced patient metabolic
risk and weight.78 These specialized areas of practice among
rehabilitation services for seniors are still lacking evidence and warrant
further research.
Stroke
Physiotherapy aims to restore physical function among stroke survivors
and is provided in specialized stroke units, in-patient hospital wards and
rehabilitation units, and the community.79 The need for physiotherapy
following stroke is included in the Canadian Heart and Stroke
Foundation’s Canadian stroke guidelines.80 Physiotherapy programs
for stroke patients are effective in preventing subsequent acute events,
reducing the odds of poor outcomes and rehospitalization, and assisting
with patient transition from hospital to home. Research shows that a
variety of physiotherapy interventions, including short- and long-distance
walking, significantly improve functional outcomes.81,82,83 Since one study
could not identify any one approach that is more effective in promoting
recovery in these patients, the authors recommend that individualized
74 75 Malak and others, “Dysfunctions Associated With Dementia and Their Treatment.”
Burton and others, “Effectiveness of Exercise Programs to Reduce Falls in Older People
With Dementia.”
76 Chan and others, “Efficacy of Physical Exercise in Preventing Falls in Older Adults With
Cognitive Impairment.”
77 78 Gisbert and Schenkman, “Physical Therapist Interventions for Parkinson Disease.”
Vera-Garcia and others, “A Systematic Review of the Benefits of Physical Therapy Within
a Multidisciplinary Care Approach for People With Schizophrenia.”
79 CPA, Stroke.
80 81 82 83 hebert and others, “Canadian Stroke Best Practice Recommendations.”
Ferrarello and others, “Efficacy of Physiotherapy Interventions Late After Stroke.”
Saunders and others, “Physical Fitness Training for Stroke Patients.”
peurala and others, “Evidence for the Effectiveness of Walking Training on Walking and
Self‑Care After Stroke.”
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 29
The Role of PhysiotheRApy in Canada
Contributing to a Stronger Health Care System
treatment should be tailored to the evidence available for that specific
type of treatment.84 For example, lumbar stabilization exercises have
a positive effect on balance abilities,85 and tailored counselling with
personalized supervised exercises have a positive effect on long-term
physical activity participation and functional exercise capacity in patients
after stroke.86
There is also emerging evidence that repetitive task-specific training
is effective in improving sit-to-stand ability,87 walking distance, speed,
and activities of daily living.88 A novel approach for improving physical
function and disability involves having a trained assistant instruct
patients on exercises and adaptive strategies over the telephone,
with recommendations provided by a pt (or occupational therapist).
Telerehabilitation was deemed to be a useful supplement to traditional
post-stroke rehabilitation given the limited resources available for
in-home rehabilitations for these patients.89 Key challenges in this area
are the need for more rehabilitation beds, which are costly and require
staff with specialized training, and the need for services in rural and
remote communities to serve patients close to home.90
Musculoskeletal Conditions
Musculoskeletal (MSK) conditions can be defined as a broad range of
disorders that affect the bones, joints, and connective tissue. Arthritis
(and related conditions) and trauma are included in this definition.91
Patients with MSK can reduce and/or eliminate pain, muscle weakness,
and loss of stability through pt assessment and treatment, as an
alternative to pain medication.92,93 In addition, physiotherapy reduces
84 85 86 87 88 89 pollock and others, “Physical Rehabilitation Approaches for the Recovery of Function and Mobility.”
Ko, Jung, and Bae, “Effect of Lumbar Stabilization Exercises on the Balance Ability of Patients With
Stroke.”
Morris, Macgillivray, and McFarlane, “Interventions to Promote Long-Term Participation in Physical
Activity After Stroke.”
pollock and others, “Interventions for Improving Sit-to-Stand Ability Following Stroke (Review).”
French and others, “Does Repetitive Task Training Improve Functional Activity After Stroke?”
Chumbler and others, “Effects of Telerehabilitation on Physical Function and Disability for Stroke
Patients.”
90 Mitton and Dionne, Valuation of Physiotherapy Services in Canada.
91 CPA, Musculoskeletal Conditions.
92 ibid.
93 Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, “CDC Guideline for Prescribing Opioids for Chronic Pain.”
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 30
© The Conference Board of Canada. All rights reserved. Please contact cboc.ca/ip with questions or concerns about the use of this material.
Chapter 4 | the Conference Board of Canada
Physiotherapy
has been shown
to decrease
workplace claims
and loss of
work time.
disability, promotes recovery from injury, reduces the risk of re-injury
and enables early detection of acute events.94,95 Systematic reviews
have found that training programs, including strength/resistance training,
balance, proprioception, and education components, are effective in
reducing the risk of sports injuries among athletes.96,97,98 More generally,
exercise therapy as a physiotherapeutic rehabilitation intervention
reduces pain and improves activities of daily living in patients with
musculoskeletal pain.99 As well, intermediate care for these patients
provided by an interdisciplinary team that includes physiotherapists
improves patient outcomes, often leads to appropriate referral and
management, reduces waiting times, and improves patient satisfaction.100
New research has shown that patients with MSK problems who used
PhysioDirect services, based on a telephone assessment and advice
from a pt, were not only treated more quickly but also had the same
clinical outcomes as those who had a face-to-face appointment.101
Exercise adherence could also be improved through supervised or
individualized exercise therapy.102 Moreover, workplace resistance
training performed at 70 to 85 per cent of one-repetition maximum
(1RM),103 three times a week for 20 minutes, promotes reduction of
musculoskeletal pain in the shoulders, wrists, and spine.104
In the workplace, physiotherapy has been shown to decrease workplace
claims and loss of work time and increase physical functioning and
earlier return to work.105 Although the cost of pts treating MSK
conditions is high, treatment may lower total health care costs by
94 95 ibid.
Mitton and Dionne, Valuation of Physiotherapy Services in Canada.
96 97 98 99 100 101 102 103 104 105 Leppänen and others, “Interventions to Prevent Sports Related Injuries.”
Michaelidis and Koumantakis, “Effects of Knee Injury Primary Prevention Programs on Anterior
Cruciate Ligament Injury Rates in Female Athletes in Different Sports.”
Kristensen and Franklyn-Miller, “Resistance Training in Musculoskeletal Rehabilitation.”
Lorås and others, “Medical Exercise Therapy for Treating Musculoskeletal Pain.”
hussenbux and others, “Intermediate Care Pathways for Musculoskeletal Conditions.”
Salisbury and others, “Effectiveness of PhysioDirect Telephone Assessment and Advice Services.”
Jordan and others, “Interventions to Improve Adherence to Exercise for Chronic Musculoskeletal
Pain.”
Repetitive maximum refers to the maximum number of repetitions of a strength training exercise that
can be completed with a given resistance or weight.
Rodrigues and others, “Effects of Exercise on Pain of Musculoskeletal Disorders.”
Mitton and Dionne, Valuation of Physiotherapy Services in Canada.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 31
The Role of PhysiotheRApy in Canada
Contributing to a Stronger Health Care System
decreasing reliance on other health care providers, appropriately triaging
patients, and reducing the number of visits required over time.106 While
patient acceptability of receiving pt and satisfaction is high, access and
uptake rates are dependent on physician referral, availability of on-site
clinics, and the patient’s socioeconomic status.107 The MSK rehabilitation
area of practice is in need of more pts working in rural areas.108,109
Low Back Pain
Physiotherapy management of low back pain includes assessment
and diagnosis, manual therapy, electrotherapeutic modalities exercise
prescription, education, self-management strategies, and workplace
intervention.110 Physiotherapy for patients with low back pain is highly
effective in reducing acute and chronic pain, improving physical function,
decreasing wait times, promoting a healthier lifestyle and independent
living, and limiting the risk of increased disability and chronic
conditions.111 Some evidence points to the benefits of a multidisciplinary
approach. For example, a recent systematic review showed that
patients with chronic low back pain receiving a multidisciplinary
biopsychosocial rehabilitation program administered by various health
care professionals—including pts—experienced less pain and disability
as compared to those receiving the usual medical care or physical
therapy alone. The program also had a positive influence on work status.
The cost-effectiveness of such a program is currently being assessed.112
Another review suggests that both a multidisciplinary approach and
physiotherapy treatment are appropriate for those with chronic low back
pain, but physiotherapy is the preferred treatment due to the higher costs
involved with a multidisciplinary approach.113
Other research shows that physiotherapy treatment for post-acute
low back pain is slightly more effective for intermediate-term function
106 ibid.
107 ibid.
108 ibid.
109 111 112 113 Cihi, Physiotherapists in Canada, 2009.
110 CPA, Low Back Pain.
Mitton and Dionne, Valuation of Physiotherapy Services in Canada.
Kamper and others, “Multidisciplinary Biopsychosocial Rehabilitation for Chronic Low Back Pain.”
van Oort and others, “Physiotherapy or Multidisciplinary Treatment for Chronic Low Back Pain.”
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 32
© The Conference Board of Canada. All rights reserved. Please contact cboc.ca/ip with questions or concerns about the use of this material.
Chapter 4 | the Conference Board of Canada
and intermediate and long-term pain than advice for self-management
strategies.114 Specific strategies, such as core strength training
exercises,115 coordination/stabilization exercise programs,116 and aerobic
exercise117 are effective in alleviating chronic low back pain. Additionally,
exercise therapy has shown to decrease pain, disability, and/or sick leave
among pregnant women with lumbopelvic pain.118 Another study showed
that group-based physiotherapy-led self-management interventions for
chronic low back pain appear to be just as clinically effective as individual
physiotherapy; however, research on its cost-effectiveness is needed.119
There is also evidence that specific cognitive behaviour therapies, such
as operant conditioning, can be integrated into physiotherapy practice
for standard low back pain management and prevention.120,121 As for
prevention strategies for low back pain, there is evidence that exercise
alone or in combination with education is effective.122 Conclusively,
rehabilitation programs for low back pain are effective.
Joint Arthroplasty (Replacement Surgery)
pts have been found to be effective in clinical patient outcomes in
expanded roles in the care of patients undergoing total knee or total
hip arthroplasty (also known as joint replacement surgery).123
Some key interventions supporting joint arthroplasty clinical pathways
to improve process and financial outcomes include pre-admission
exercises or “prehabilitation,”124 assessment and testing, post-operative
rehabilitation, discharge management, home-based physiotherapy, and
114 115 116 117 118 119 120 121 122 123 124 Richards and others, “The Effectiveness of Physiotherapy Functional Restoration for Post-Acute Low
Back Pain.”
Chang, Lin, and Lai, “Core Strength Training for Patients With Chronic Low Back Pain.”
Searle and others, “Exercise Interventions for the Treatment of Chronic Low Back Pain.”
Meng and Yue, “Efficacy of Aerobic Exercise for Treatment of Chronic Low Back Pain.”
van Benten and others, “Recommendations for Physical Therapists on the Treatment
of Lumbopelvic Pain.”
toomey, “The Effectiveness of Physiotherapist-Delivered Group Education and Exercise
Interventions.”
Brunner and others, “Can Cognitive Behavioural Therapy Based Strategies Be Integrated.”
Bunzli, Gillham, and Esterman, “Physiotherapy-Provided Operant Conditioning in the Management
of Low Back Pain Disability.”
Steffens and others, “Prevention of Low Back Pain.”
Large and others, “Physiotherapy-Led Arthroplasty Review Clinic.”
Santa Mina and others, “Effect of Total-Body Prehabilitation on Postoperative Outcomes.”
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 33
The Role of PhysiotheRApy in Canada
Contributing to a Stronger Health Care System
Exercise is
effective in
reducing the
rate of falls and
risk of falling
follow-up.125 However, it must be noted that there is currently not enough
evidence to support the implementation of pre-operative education or
pre-operative physiotherapy programs.126,127 Other research shows that
for those people waiting for a hip replacement surgery, exercise-based
interventions can reduce pain and improve physical function, but not for
those waiting for a knee replacement surgery.128
Early intervention, which can decrease hospital length of stay, and
discharging patients home with supportive therapy can reduce overall
costs on the health care system.129 Indeed, a systematic review found
that physical therapy performed in a clinic under the supervision of a pt
may provide the best long-term outcomes after surgery.130
Additionally, pts triage patients for joint arthroplasty referrals to
ensure appropriateness for surgical intervention and educate patients
wait-listed for surgery.131 Post-operatively, studies show that those
who participated in physiotherapy programs experienced improved
outcomes, such as reduced pain and increased joint range of motion.132
Further, physiotherapy-led arthroplasty review clinics after hip and knee
replacement surgery seem to be a safe and effective service alternative
to reviews conducted by orthopaedic surgeons.
Falls
Falls are the leading cause of injury among older Canadians,
contributing about $2 billion a year in direct health care costs.133 Exercise
interventions are effective in reducing falls in community-dwelling
seniors. A recent review showed consistent evidence that exercise is
effective in reducing the rate of falls and risk of falling,134 although results
125 126 127 128 herck and others, “Key Interventions and Outcomes in Joint Arthroplasty Clinical Pathways.”
Jordan and others, “Enhanced Education and Physiotherapy Before Knee Replacement.”
Santa Mina and others, “Effect of Total-Body Prehabilitation on Postoperative Outcomes.”
Gill and McBurney, “Does Exercise Reduce Pain and Improve Physical Function Before Hip
or Knee Replacement Surgery?”
129 130 132 133 134 Mitton and Dionne, Valuation of Physiotherapy Services in Canada.
pozzi, Snyder-Mackler, and Zeni, “Physical Exercise After Knee Arthroplasty.”
131 CPA, Joint Arthroplasty.
Grotle and others, “What’s in Team Rehabilitation Care After Arthroplasty for Osteoarthritis?”
public Health Agency of Canada, Seniors’ Falls in Canada.
Gillespie and others, “Interventions for Preventing Falls in Older People Living in the
Community (Review).”
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 34
© The Conference Board of Canada. All rights reserved. Please contact cboc.ca/ip with questions or concerns about the use of this material.
Chapter 4 | the Conference Board of Canada
varied with the exact type, duration, frequency, and setting of exercise
interventions. When it comes to the most optimal exercise to prevent
falls, a program that includes endurance, balance, and strength exercise
components is recommended.135 For example, the Otago exercise
program, which consisted of strength and balance retraining, significantly
reduced the risk of death and falling in seniors living in the community.136
Perturbation-based balance training is also effective in reducing fall
risk among seniors and those with Parkinson’s disease.137 Additionally,
research shows that exercise intervention in residential care settings
improves performance on some tests of physical function (such as the
Berg Balance Scale) for seniors with visual impairments, but its impact
on falls warrants further research.138 The main challenges to service
expansion in this area are the lack of pts with specialized training in
geriatric rehabilitation,139 lack of funding for prevention, and lack of
rehabilitation services in rural and remote communities.
Urinary Incontinence
Urinary incontinence, the involuntary loss of urine associated with
urgency or with effort, physical exertion, sneezing, or coughing, is a
neglected problem in the aging population and a strong predictor of a
need for care.140 The prevalence of urinary incontinence is one of the
most common impairments in older age and is much more common
among women,141 affecting at least one in three older women. It is
a medical condition that is often curable and should be treated.142
Physiotherapy for female stress urinary incontinence (SUI) includes
pelvic floor physiotherapy and lifestyle and behavioural therapy. Evidence
showed greater improvements in SUI when women received at least
135 136 137 138 139 140 141 142 Stubbs, Brefka, and Denkinger, “What Works to Prevent Falls in Community-Dwelling Older Adults?”
thomas, Mackintosh, and Halbert, “Does the ‘Otago Exercise Programme’ Reduce Mortality
and Falls.”
Mansfield and others, “Does Perturbation-Based Balance Training Prevent Falls?”
Gleeson, Sherrington, and Keay, “Exercise and Physical Training Improve Physical Function
in Older Adults.”
Mitton and Dionne, Valuation of Physiotherapy Services in Canada.
yuan, Williams, and Liu, “Attitudes Toward Urinary Incontinence.”
Milsom and others, “Global Prevalence and Economic Burden of Urgency Urinary Incontinence.”
Chang, Lynm, and Glass, “Urinary Incontinence in Older Women.”
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 35
The Role of PhysiotheRApy in Canada
Contributing to a Stronger Health Care System
one three-month supervised exercise program.143 The effectiveness of
the treatment was increased if principles such as intensity, duration,
and the body position during pelvic floor training were considered.144
Another systematic review showed that combined physical and
behavioural therapies are effective in the short term for older people
in care homes with urinary incontinence.145 Moreover, one review found
that pelvic floor muscle training programs improved continence rates
in the short and long term for men who had a prostatectomy, similar to
those of pt-guided programs; and thus, these muscle-training programs
may be more cost-effective.146 Overall, the literature shows that physical
therapy treatment is effective to decrease urinary incontinence in older
women, though there are a limited number of studies in this area.147
Health Promotion and Injury Prevention
Initiatives in Primary Health Care
This section explores the role of and potential for physiotherapy in
primary health care in more detail. Health promotion strategies, as
a tenet of primary health care, warranted its own section as it is a
fundamental premise in managing chronic diseases and must be a focus
among health care professionals to improve the sustainability of the
health system. Physiotherapy has demonstrated effectiveness in health
promotion and injury prevention programming and approaches.
143 144 145 146 147 148 What Is Primary Health Care?
Primary health care (phC) aims to directly meet the health care needs of
the local community by acting as the first point of contact for health care
services. The team of phC professionals not only diagnose and treat
health conditions/illness but also incorporate injury prevention, health
promotion, and chronic disease management into their daily practice.148
price, Dawood, and Jackson, “Pelvic Floor Exercise for Urinary Incontinence.”
Ghaderi and Oskouei, “Physiotherapy for Women With Stress Urinary Incontinence.”
Flanagan and others, “Systematic Review of Care Intervention Studies for the Management
of Incontinence.”
Fernandez, “Improvement of Continence Rate With Pelvic Floor Muscle Training Post-Prostatectomy.”
pereira, Escobar, and Driusso, “Effects of Physical Therapy in Older Women With
Urinary Incontinence.”
health Canada, What Is Primary Health Care?
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 36
© The Conference Board of Canada. All rights reserved. Please contact cboc.ca/ip with questions or concerns about the use of this material.
Chapter 4 | the Conference Board of Canada
Interprofessional primary care (ipC) teams are groups of professionals
from different disciplines who work together to provide health services
within a community. ipC teams have been shown to produce multiple
benefits compared with care provided by a solo care provider, including
significant improvements in health and wellness for patients with
chronic conditions and risk factors.149 These teams have also been
found to offset the costs to other parts of the health care system, such
as acute care, and improve labour force participation by increasing
the life expectancy and quality of life of Canadians.150 To improve the
effectiveness and efficiency of the health care system and maximize
their public investments, Canadian governments are looking to expand
the use of interprofessional, collaborative teams to deliver high-quality
primary health care services.151
The Role of Physiotherapy
Many provincial physiotherapy associations, such as those of Alberta,
Saskatchewan, Ontario, and New Brunswick, have released position
statements supporting the inclusion and importance of pts in primary
health care. The roles and activities of pts in phC range from
assessment, diagnosis, counselling, education, and management
for various conditions and diseases to system navigation for diverse
community programs and services.152 pts, as phC providers, consider
population health needs and incorporate population health approaches
into program planning and treatment interventions to enhance the impact
on health outcomes. For example, pts play an important role in the
prevention and management of chronic disease, including hypertension,
emphysema, Type 2 diabetes, and obesity.
Evidence of Effectiveness
Physiotherapy can significantly impact the future use of health care
services by allowing patients to access the care they need before they
149 150 151 152 dinh and Bounajm, Improving Primary Health Care Through Collaboration: Briefing 3.
dinh, Improving Primary Health Care Through Collaboration: Briefing 2.
dinh, Stonebridge, and Thériault, Getting the Most Out of Health Care Teams.
ontario Physiotherapy Association, Physiotherapists in Primary Health Care.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 37
153 154 155 156 157 158 159 160 161 162 163 The Role of PhysiotheRApy in Canada
Contributing to a Stronger Health Care System
require acute care.153 The benefits of including pts within phC teams
internationally include higher patient satisfaction,154 decreased wait
times for physiotherapy consultation,155 improved patient outcomes,156
decreased wait times for surgery, increased return to work, fewer
emergency room visits, reduced volume of referrals to specialists,
reduced use of medication,157 increased likelihood that patients will
achieve their treatment goals,158 and cost-effective care and efficient use
of health human resources.159 Research that surveyed family physicians
and nurse practitioners across Ontario found that the integration of pts
within Ontario phC teams is well supported and there is potential for
their role to evolve as part of this process. Respondents indicated that
the contributions of pts to health programming in primary health care
are important and the Ontario phC teams that do not have a pt may be
missing an important perspective to their programming and services.160
A scoping review showed that pts help patients manage their chronic
disease through self-management interventions that primarily focus on
physical activity.161 This supports the role of pts as health counsellors
solely or within a multidisciplinary team.162 They promote positive
behaviour change in their patients through health education strategies.
Some common principles that pts consider include theories to inform
their approach; timing (e.g., pre- and post-assessments and follow-up);
session structure (e.g., brief advice, individual or group session, or
via telephone); technique (e.g., motivational prompts, individualized
programs, and goal setting); and delivery method.163
CPA, The Value of Physiotherapy.
Jones and others, “A Pilot Study of Pulmonary Rehabilitation in Primary Care.”
Stanley and others, “Uptake of Prompt Access to Physiotherapy.”
Barrett and others, CHSRF Synthesis.
naci and Ioannidis, “Comparative Effectiveness of Exercise and Drug Interventions on Mortality
Outcomes.”
holdsworth, Webster, and McFayden, “What Are the Costs to nhS Scotland of Self-Referral
to Physiotherapy?”
Leemrijse, Swinkles, and Veenhof, “Direct Access to Physical Therapy in the Netherlands.”
dufour, “Understanding the Roles of Physiotherapists Within Ontario Primary Health Care Teams.”
Richardson and others, “Self-Management Interventions for Chronic Disease.”
Frerichs and others, “Can Physical Therapists Counsel Patients With Lifestyle-Related
Health Conditions.”
Alexander and others, “Health Education Strategies Used by Physical Therapists to Promote
Behaviour Change.”
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 38
© The Conference Board of Canada. All rights reserved. Please contact cboc.ca/ip with questions or concerns about the use of this material.
Chapter 4 | the Conference Board of Canada
There are many
opportunities
for integrating
physiotherapy into
Fhts by partnering
with existing
physiotherapy
services.
One study in the Netherlands demonstrated that using an eight-week
proprioceptive training program in addition to the usual care for an
ankle sprain was cost-effective for preventing recurrent ankle sprains
compared to usual care alone. It was estimated that this program can
save an annual €35.9 million in medical and lost productivity costs.164
As well, research has demonstrated that patients who participated in
tailored exercise programs required fewer emergency readmissions and
physician visits and experienced a higher self-reported quality of life than
those patients who received usual care.165
pts with expertise in cardiopulmonary-vascular health could ultimately
enhance health promotion efforts and improve the chronic disease
management within primary health care.166 For example, a recent study
found that services delivered by pts who focused on chronic disease
management within a family health team (Fht) in Hamilton were
associated with a reduction in planned hospital days as well as improved
patient satisfaction.167
Moreover, a study involving interviews with key informants from Fhts
across Ontario found that there are many opportunities for integrating
physiotherapy into Fhts by partnering with existing physiotherapy
services. Most interview participants in this study believed that there
is value in adding physiotherapy services to the Fht’s list of offered
services, particularly given the current and future challenge of meeting
the primary care needs of the growing number of Ontarians with chronic
diseases. The major challenge in both cases remains the difficulty of
accessing physiotherapy services outside of hospitals as a result of the
lack of public funding for community-based physiotherapy services.168
Timely and appropriate pt care at the community level can reduce
the burden on the health care system by decreasing the need for
medications and fully publicly funded institutional care.
164 165 166 ibid.
hupperets and others, “Potential Savings of a Program to Prevent Ankle Sprain Recurrence.”
Mitton and Dionne, Valuation of Physiotherapy Services in Canada.
167 168 Richardson and others, “Rehabilitation in a Primary Care Setting for Persons With Chronic Illness.”
Cott, Mandoda, and Landry, “Models of Integrating Physical Therapists Into Family Health Teams
in Ontario.”
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 39
The Role of PhysiotheRApy in Canada
Contributing to a Stronger Health Care System
Rehabilitative Services for Seniors
This section describes rehabilitation needs for seniors and potential
opportunities for pts to meet this need. The population of Canada
is aging and the health care needs of this aging population will only
continue to increase. In this report we decided to highlight the value
of pts in the context of rehabilitative services for seniors, with the
intent of further estimating this value in the third report of this research
series on the demand for pt services in continuing care.
Current and Future Rehabilitation Needs
Individuals who experience disability and who may have difficulty
achieving optimal functioning within their current environment can
be supported through rehabilitation.169 EKOS Research Associates
conducted a survey on behalf of The Conference Board’s Canadian
Alliance for Sustainable Health Care (CASHC).170 At the request of
the Conference Board, EKOS included an oversample of respondents
55 years and older. When it came to unmet health care needs, 23 per
cent of respondents reported an unmet need related to rehabilitation
services. Although 35 per cent reported using rehabilitation care services
in the past year, nationally, 29 per cent reported a need for additional
rehabilitative services and cited reasons such as lack of availability and
high costs as reasons for not seeking service. Respondents in Atlantic
Canada reported the lowest usage of rehabilitative services at half the
national average.
In a decade (year 2026), approximately 2.4 million Canadians aged
65 years and older will need paid and unpaid continuing care support—
a 71 per cent increase from 2011. By 2046, this number will increase to
almost 3.3 million, corresponding with a growth of 129 per cent since
2011. As a result, total dollars spent on continuing care supports for
seniors in Canada (excluding the territories) is expected to increase,
along with inflation, from $28.3 billion in 2011 to $177.3 billion in 2046.
169 170 Stucki, Cieza, and Melvin, “The International Classification of Functioning, Disability and Health (ICF).”
A total of 3,883 respondents were surveyed online and 244 were surveyed by telephone. The sample
population was selected from EKOS’ proprietary panel, Probit, which covers the entire population
(on and offline, cell only, and landline). The distribution of the recruitment process mirrors the actual
population in Canada (as defined by Statistics Canada).
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 40
© The Conference Board of Canada. All rights reserved. Please contact cboc.ca/ip with questions or concerns about the use of this material.
Chapter 4 | the Conference Board of Canada
With governments continuing to provide almost two-thirds of this
spending, this will substantially exceed the pace of revenue growth for
most provinces.171 Health and health care must be made sustainable.
The Role of Physiotherapy
pts are in an ideal position to support the independence of aging
Canadians. Maintaining mobility is important for people as they age.
Mobility is necessary for doing things around the house; accessing
shops, services, and facilities in the community (such as parks); and
participating in social and cultural activities. Declines in mobility can
result in further decrements in health, such as increasing the risk of
falls,172 which can have negative impacts on seniors’ overall well-being
and limit other areas of functioning.173 Maintaining health, physical
function, and rehabilitation following an illness or injury can be helpful
in restoring and maintaining capacity in seniors who have declines in
mobility associated with conditions such as a stroke, a cardiac event,
or injury.174
Physical activity is crucial for seniors. The loss of muscle mass,
decreased flexibility, and problems with balance and coordination can
all make getting around more difficult. Physical activity has multiple
other benefits in older age. These include improving physical and mental
capacities (e.g., maintaining muscle strength and cognitive function,
reducing anxiety and depression, and improving self-esteem); preventing
disease and reducing the risk of coronary heart disease, diabetes, and
stroke; and improving social outcomes (e.g., increasing community
involvement and maintaining social networks and intergenerational
links).175 Mobility limitations are common but are amenable to exercise
interventions and could be routinely addressed in primary care visits.176
pts can contribute to healthy aging across the country and improve
mental and physical well-being among seniors.
171 172 173 174 175 176 hermus, Stonebridge, and Edenhoffer, Future Care for Canadian Seniors.
perracini and others, “Falls in Older Adults.”
nordbakke and Schwanen, “Well-Being and Mobility.”
prince and others, “The Burden of Disease in Older People and Implications for Health Policy
and Practice.”
World Health Organization, World Report on Ageing and Health.
Brown and Flood, “Mobility Limitation in the Older Patient.”
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 41
The Role of PhysiotheRApy in Canada
Contributing to a Stronger Health Care System
Evidence of Effectiveness
Physical rehabilitation has been associated with improved independence
in daily living activities in elderly residents of long-term care facilities.177
One review found that strength- and balance-training exercises can
easily be provided by a pt. A great deal of data exist that support pt-led
exercise interventions, including specific exercises to strengthen the
lower extremities and improve balance. Moreover, physical rehabilitation
has been shown to be safe and effective at reducing falls in older
adults who are at high risk for falls.178 Physical activity also appears
to preserve, and may even improve, cognitive function in people with
dementia, reducing cognitive decline by around one-third.179 Similarly,
stroke causes some of the greatest burden of disease in older age, and
moderate physical activity may reduce the risk by 11 to 15 per cent, with
vigorous physical activity having even greater benefits and reducing the
risk by 19 to 22 per cent.180
The primary health care pilot project called Getting a Grip on Arthritis: A
National Primary Health Care Community Initiative included pts in the
provision of resources and development of tools to educate providers
and their patients around the resources available, how to exercise,
medication, and how to cope with arthritis and pain. The initiative had a
significant impact on patients, with 83 per cent reporting increased ability
in self-management of these chronic conditions.181
177 178 179 180 181 Crocker and others, “The Effect of Physical Rehabilitation on Activities of Daily Living in Older
Residents.”
tofthagen, Visovsky, and Berry, “Strength and Balance Training for Adults With Peripheral
Neuropathy.”
norton and others, “Potential for Primary Prevention of Alzheimer’s Disease.”
diep and others, “Association of Physical Activity Level and Stroke Outcomes in Men and Women.”
health Canada, Getting a Grip on Arthritis.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 42
© The Conference Board of Canada. All rights reserved. Please contact cboc.ca/ip with questions or concerns about the use of this material.
CHAPTER 5
Conclusion and Next Steps
•
•
•
Chapter Summary
The physiotherapy workforce is growing, along with the demand for services and
new opportunities for pts.
pts can contribute to creating a more efficient health system through a focus
on primary care, injury prevention, and rehabilitation.
The subsequent reports will provide further analysis of the mobility and
rehabilitation market in Canada, concluding with recommendations for the
future of the profession.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca.
The Role of PhysiotheRApy in Canada
Contributing to a Stronger Health Care System
Physiotherapy’s scope of practice has evolved
over time. The demand for physiotherapy
services, along with the workforce, appears
to be increasing. Although the physiotherapy
workforce has grown in the last five years, over
40 per cent of PTs are employed in the hospital
setting, despite the potentially growing need
for PTs within home and community settings.
Physiotherapy can be cost-effective and can
improve health outcomes among patients in
a variety of settings and areas of practice,
including health promotion and prevention.
Unfortunately, challenges exist in terms of
varying funding models across the country,
including gaps in covering community and
primary care.
All pts in Canada hold the capacity to assess physical function and
prescribe exercise programs within their scope of practice. The aging
Canadian population and the increased burden of chronic diseases
provides new opportunities to optimize the scope of practice of
physiotherapists in the primary health care setting to address changing
population needs. pts are in an excellent position to promote healthy
aging and maintain mobility and prevent injuries among seniors and have
a key role to play in encouraging and prescribing healthy, active living
among the broader Canadian population. There is a need for increased
health human resources within promotion and prevention, and pts are
well positioned to address this need and to contribute to creating a more
efficient and interdisciplinary health system.
The subsequent reports in this research series will provide a market
analysis to profile the physiotherapy occupation in Canada; quantify the
demand and supply for physiotherapy services, specifically focusing on
seniors’ care; and discuss the future of pt in relation to the changing
demographics and health care needs of the Canadian population from a
training, policy, and practice perspective.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 44
© The Conference Board of Canada. All rights reserved. Please contact cboc.ca/ip with questions or concerns about the use of this material.
Appendix A | the Conference Board of Canada
APPENDIX A
Bibliography
3D Analytics and Consulting. The Practice of Physiotherapy in Canadian
Extended Health Insurance. Report prepared for the Canadian
Physiotherapy Association.
Adami, P., A. Negro, N. Lala, and P. Martelleti. “The Role of Physical
Activity in the Prevention and Treatment of Chronic Diseases.” Clinical
Therapeutics 161, no. 6 (2010): 537–41.
Alberga, A., A. Frappier, R. J. Sigal, D. Prud’homme, and G. Kenny.
“A Review of Randomized Controlled Trials of Aerobic Exercise Training
on Fitness and Cardiometabolic Risk Factors in Obese Adolescents.”
The Physician and Sportsmedicine 41, no. 2 (2013): 44–57.
Alexander, E., S. Rosenthal, and C. Evans. “Achieving Consensus on
Recommendations for the Clinical Management of Overweight and
Obese Adults for Canadian Physiotherapy Practice.” Physiotherapy
Canada 64, no. 1 (2012): 42–52.
Alexander, J., E. Bambury, A. Mendoza, J. Reynolds, R. Veronneau, and
E. Dean. “Health Education Strategies Used by Physical Therapists to
Promote Behaviour Change in People With Lifestyle-Related Conditions:
A Systematic Review.” Hong Kong Physiotherapy Journal 30, no. 2
(December 2012): 57–75.
Anderson, L., N. ldridge, D. R. Thompson, A.-D. Zwisler, K. Rees,
N. Martin, and R. S. Taylor. “Exercise-Based Cardiac Rehabilitation for
Coronary Heart Disease.” Journal of the American College of Cardiology
67, no. 1 (2016): 1–12.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 45
The Role of PhysiotheRApy in Canada
Contributing to a Stronger Health Care System
Barrett, J., V. Curran, L. Glynn, and M. Godwin. CHSRF Synthesis:
Interprofessional Collaboration and Quality Primary Healthcare. Ottawa:
Canadian Health Services Research Foundation, 2007. www.cfhi-
fcass.ca/Migrated/pdF/SynthesisReport_E_rev4_FinAL.pdf (accessed
March 1, 2016).
Baumann, F. T., W. Bloch, and J. Buelertz. “Clinical Exercise
Interventions in Pediatric Oncology: A Systematic Review.” Pediatrics
Research 74, no. 4 (2013): 366–74.
Brown, C. J., and K. L. Flood. “Mobility Limitation in the Older Patient:
A Clinical Review.” Journal of the American Medical Association 310,
no. 11 (2013): 1168–77.
Brunner, E., A. De Herdt, P. Minguet, S.-S. Baldew, and M. Probst.
“Can Cognitive Behavioural Therapy Based Strategies Be Integrated
Into Physiotherapy for the Prevention of Chronic Low Back Pain? A
Systematic Review.” Disability and Rehabilitation 35, no. 1 (2013): 1–10.
Bruurs, M. L., L. J. Van der Giessen, and H. Moed. “The Effectiveness
of Physiotherapy in Patients With Asthma: A Systematic Review of the
Literature.” Respiratory Medicine 107, no. 4 (2013): 483–94.
Bunzli, S., D. Gillham, and A. Esterman. “Physiotherapy-Provided
Operant Conditioning in the Management of Low Back Pain Disability:
A Systematic Review.” Physiotherapy Research International 16, no. 1
(2011): 4–19.
Burton, E., V. Cavalheri, R. Adams, C. Browne, P. Bovery-Spencer,
A. M. Fenton, B. W. Campbell, and K. D. Hill. “Effectiveness of Exercise
Programs to Reduce Falls in Older People With Dementia Living in
the Community: A Systematic Review and Meta-analysis.” Clinical
Interventions in Aging 10 (2015): 421–434.
Calvo-Ayala, E., B. A. Khan, M. O. Farber, E. W. Ely, and M. A. Boustani.
“Interventions to Improve the Physical Function of ICU Survivors:
A Systematic Review.” Chest 144, no. 5 (2013): 1469–80.
Canadian Council of Physiotherapy University Programs. Description
of Physiotherapy in Canada. 2012. www.physiotherapyeducation.ca/
CanadianPrograms.html (accessed January 20, 2016).
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 46
© The Conference Board of Canada. All rights reserved. Please contact cboc.ca/ip with questions or concerns about the use of this material.
Appendix A | the Conference Board of Canada
Canadian Institute for Health Information (Cihi). Health Workforce
Database. www.cihi.ca/en/spending-and-health-workforce/
health-workforce/hwdb-metadata.
—. Health Workforce Database Methodology Guide for Data Tables,
2014. 2015. https://secure.cihi.ca/free_products/2014_HW_Meth_Guide_
en_web.pdf (accessed January 20, 2016).
—. Measuring the Level and Determinants of Health System Efficiency
in Canada. 2014. www.cihi.ca/en/hse_technicalreport_en_web.pdf
(accessed January 20, 2016).
—. Physiotherapists, 2014. https://secure.cihi.ca/estore/productSeries.
htm?pc=PCC439.
—. Physiotherapists in Canada, 2010: National and Jurisdictional
Highlights and Profiles. 2011. www.cihi.ca/en/ptdb2010_provincial_prof_
en.pdf (accessed January 20, 2016).
—. Physiotherapists in Canada, 2009. 2010. www.cptbc.org/pdf/
CihiReport.ptinCanada.2009.pdf (accessed January 20, 2016).
Canadian Physiotherapy Association. Cardiovascular Rehabilitation.
2012. https://physiotherapy.ca/sites/default/files/valuept/cpa_valuept_
cardiorehab-en.pdf (accessed January 20, 2016).
—. Chronic Disease. 2012. https://physiotherapy.ca/sites/default/files/
valuept/cpa_valuept_chronicdisease-en.pdf (accessed January 20,
2016).
—. Chronic Lung Disease. 2012. https://physiotherapy.ca/sites/default/
files/valuept/cpa_valuept_chroniclungdisease-en.pdf (accessed
January 20, 2016).
—. Description of Physiotherapy in Canada: 2012. https://physiotherapy.
ca/sites/default/files/site_documents/dopen-en.pdf (accessed
January 20, 2016).
—. Emergency Department. 2012. https://physiotherapy.ca/sites/default/
files/valuept/cpa_valuept_erdept-en.pdf (accessed January 20, 2016).
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 47
The Role of PhysiotheRApy in Canada
Contributing to a Stronger Health Care System
—. Home-Based Physiotherapy. 2012. https://physiotherapy.ca/sites/
default/files/valuept/cpa_valuept_homebasedphysio-en.pdf (accessed
January 20, 2016).
—. Intensive Care Unit. 2012. https://physiotherapy.ca/sites/default/files/
valuept/cpa_valuept_icu-en.pdf (accessed January 20, 2016).
—. Joint Arthroplasty. 2012. https://physiotherapy.ca/sites/default/files/
valuept/cpa_valuept_jointarthroplasty-en.pdf (accessed January 20,
2016).
—. Low Back Pain. 2012. https://physiotherapy.ca/sites/default/files/
valuept/cpa_valuept_lowbackpain-en.pdf (accessed January 20, 2016).
—. Musculoskeletal Conditions. 2012. https://physiotherapy.ca/sites/
default/files/valuept/cpa_valuept_musculoskeletal-en.pdf (accessed
January 20, 2016).
—. Pediatrics. 2012. https://physiotherapy.ca/sites/default/files/valuept/
cpa_valuept_pediatrics-en.pdf (accessed January 20, 2016).
—. Stroke. 2012. https://physiotherapy.ca/sites/default/files/valuept/
cpa_valuept_stroke-en.pdf (accessed January 20, 2016).
—. The Value of Physiotherapy. https://physiotherapy.ca/
value-physiotherapy (accessed January 20, 2016).
Carey, H., and T. Long. “The Pediatric Physical Therapist’s Role in
Promoting and Measuring Participation in Children With Disabilities.”
Pediatric Physical Therapy 24, no. 2 (2012): 163–70.
Castro, A. A., S. R. Calil, S. A. Freitas, A. B. Oliveira, and E. F. Porto.
“Chest Physiotherapy Effectiveness to Reduce Hospitalization and
Mechanical Ventilation Length of Stay, Pulmonary Infection Rate and
Mortality in ICU Patients.” Respiratory Medicine 107, no. 1 (2013): 68–74.
Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. “CDC Guideline for
Prescribing Opioids for Chronic Pain—United States, 2016.” Morbidity
and Mortality Weekly Report 65, no. 1 (March 2016): 1–49. www.cdc.gov/
mmwr/volumes/65/rr/rr6501e1.htm (accessed January 22, 2016).
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 48
© The Conference Board of Canada. All rights reserved. Please contact cboc.ca/ip with questions or concerns about the use of this material.
Appendix A | the Conference Board of Canada
Chan, W. C., J. W. Yueng, C. S. Wong, L. C. Lam, K. F. Chung,
J. K. Luk, J. S. Lee, and A. C. Law. “Efficacy of Physical Exercise in
Preventing Falls in Older Adults With Cognitive Impairment: A Systematic
Review and Meta-analysis.” Journal of the American Medical Directors
Association 16, no. 2 (2015): 149–54.
Chang, H. J., C. Lynm, and R. M. Glass. “Urinary Incontinence in Older
Women.” Journal of the American Medical Association 303, no. 21
(2010): 2208.
Chang, W. D., H. Y. Lin, and P. T. Lai. “Core Strength Training for
Patients With Chronic Low Back Pain.” Journal of Physical Therapy
Science 27, no. 3 (2015): 619–22.
Chumbler, N. R., P. Quigley, X. Li, M. Morey, D. Rose, J. Sanford,
P. Griffiths, and H. Hoenig. “Effects of Telerehabilitation on Physical
Function and Disability for Stroke Patients: A Randomized, Controlled
Trial.” Stroke 43, no. 8 (2012): 2168–74.
Clegg, A., S. Barber, J. Young, A. Forster, and S. lliffe. “Do Home-
Based Exercise Interventions Improve Outcomes for Frail Older People?
Findings From a Systematic Review.” Reviews in Clinical Gerontology 22,
no. 1 (2012): 68–78.
College of Physiotherapists of Ontario. Rostering for Authorized
Activities/Controlled Acts. www.collegept.org/Physiotherapists/Rostering
(accessed January 23, 2016).
Cott, C., S. Mandoda, and M. Landry. “Models of Integrating Physical
Therapists Into Family Health Teams in Ontario, Canada: Challenges
and Opportunities.” Physiotherapy Canada 63, no. 3 (2011): 265–75.
Crocker, T., J. Young, A. Forster, L. Brown, S. Ozer, and D. C.
Greenwood. “The Effect of Physical Rehabilitation on Activities of Daily
Living in Older Residents of Long-Term Care Facilities: Systematic
Review With Meta-analysis.” Age and Ageing 42, no. 6 (2013): 682–88.
Crosbie, A. “The Effect of Physical Training in Children With Asthma
on Pulmonary Function, Aerobic Capacity and Health-Related Quality
of Life: A Systematic Review of Randomized Control Trials.” Pediatric
Exercise Science 24, no. 3 (2012): 472–89.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 49
The Role of PhysiotheRApy in Canada
Contributing to a Stronger Health Care System
Denehy, L., and S. Berney. “Physiotherapy in the Intensive Care Unit.”
Physical Therapy Reviews 11, no. 1 (2006): 49–56.
Dias, K. A., D. J. Green, C. B. Ingul, T. G. Pavey, and J. S. Coombes.
“Exercise and Vascular Function in Child Obesity: A Meta-analysis.”
Pediatrics 136, no. 3 (2015): e648–e659.
Diep, L., J. Kwagyan, J. Kurantsin-Mills, R. Weir, and A. Jayam-Trouth.
“Association of Physical Activity Level and Stroke Outcomes in Men and
Women: A Meta-analysis.” Journal of Women’s Health 19, no. 10 (2012):
1815–22.
Dinh, T. Improving Primary Health Care Through Collaboration:
Briefing 2—Barriers to Successful Interprofessional Teams. Ottawa:
The Conference Board of Canada, 2012.
—. Moving Ahead: Making the Case for Healthy Active Living in
Canada. Ottawa: The Conference Board of Canada, 2014.
Dinh, T., and F. Bounajm. Improving Primary Health Care Through
Collaboration: Briefing 3—Measuring the Missed Opportunity. Ottawa:
The Conference Board of Canada, 2013.
Dinh, T., C. Stonebridge, and L. Thériault. Getting the Most Out of Health
Care Teams: Recommendations for Action. Ottawa: The Conference
Board of Canada, 2014.
DuFour, S. “Understanding the Roles of Physiotherapists Within Ontario
Primary Health Care Teams: A Mixed Methods Inquiry.” Electronic Thesis
and Dissertation Repository, Paper 333, 2011. http://ir.lib.uwo.ca/etd/333
(accessed February 2, 2016).
Elkins, M., and R. Dentice. “Inspiratory Muscle Training Facilitates
Weaning From Mechanical Ventilation Among Patients in the Intensive
Care Unit: A Systematic Review.” Journal of Physiotherapy 61, no. 3
(2015):125–34.
Fernandez, R. A., A. Garcia-Hermoso, M. Solera-Martinez, M. T. Correa,
A. F. Morales, and V. Martinez-Vizcaino. “Improvement of Continence
Rate With Pelvic Floor Muscle Training Post-Prostatectomy: A Meta-
analysis of Randomized Controlled Trials.” Urologia Internationalis 94,
no. 2 (2015): 125–32.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 50
© The Conference Board of Canada. All rights reserved. Please contact cboc.ca/ip with questions or concerns about the use of this material.
Appendix A | the Conference Board of Canada
Ferrarello, F., M. Baccini, L. A. Rinaldi, M. C. Cavallini, E. Mussel,
G. Masotti, N. Marchionni, and M. Di Bari. “Efficacy of Physiotherapy
Interventions Late After Stroke.” Journal of Neurology, Neurosurgery,
and sychiatry 82, no. 2 (2011): 136–43.
Flanagan, L., B. Roe, B. Jack, J. Barrett, A. Chung, C. Shaw, and
K. S. Williams. “Systematic Review of Care Intervention Studies for the
Management of Incontinence and Promotion of Continence in Older
People in Care Homes With Urinary Incontinence as the Primary Focus
(1966–2010).” Geriatrics & Gerontology International 12, no. 4 (2012):
600–11.
French, B., L. Thomas, M. Leathley, C. Sutton, J. McAdam, A. Forster,
P. Langhorne, C. Price, A. Walker, and C. Watkins. “Does Repetitive
Task Training Improve Functional Activity After Stroke? A Cochrane
Systematic Review and Meta-analysis.” Journal of Rehabilitation
Medicine 42, no. 1 (2010): 9–14.
Frerichs, W., E. Kaltenbacher, J. P. van de Leur, and E. Dean. “Can
Physical Therapists Counsel Patients With Lifestyle-Related Health
Conditions Effectively? A Systematic Review and Implications.”
Physiotherapy Theory and Practice 28, no. 8 (2012): 571–81.
Ghaderi, F., and A. E. Oskouel. “Physiotherapy for Women With Stress
Urinary Incontinence: A Review Article.” Journal of Physical Therapy
Science 26, no. 9 (2014): 1493–99.
Gill, S. D., and H. McBurney. “Does Exercise Reduce Pain and Improve
Physical Function Before Hip or Knee Replacement Surgery? A
Systematic Review and Meta-analysis of Randomized Controlled Trials.”
Archives of Physical Medicine and Rehabilitation 94, no. 13 (2013):
164–76.
Gillespie, L., M. Robertson, W. Gillespie, C. Sherrington, S. Gates,
L. Clemson, and S. Lamb. “Interventions for Preventing Falls in Older
People Living in the Community (Review).” Cochrane Database of
Systematic Reviews 9 (2012): 1–420.
Gisbert, R., and M. Schenkman. “Physical Therapist Interventions for
Parkinson Disease.” Physical Therapy 95, no. 3 (2015): 299–305.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 51
The Role of PhysiotheRApy in Canada
Contributing to a Stronger Health Care System
Gleeson, M., C. Sherrington, and L. Keay. “Exercise and Physical
Training Improve Physical Function in Older Adults With Visual
Impairments but Their Effect on Falls Is Unclear: A Systematic Review.”
Journal of Physiotherapy 60, no. 3 (2014): 130–35.
Grotle, M., A. Garratt, M. Klokkerud, I. Løchting, T. Uhlig, and K. Hajen.
“What’s in Team Rehabilitation Care After Arthroplasty for Osteoarthritis?
Results From a Multicenter, Longitudinal Study Assessing Structure,
Process, and Outcome.” Physical Therapy 90, no. 1 (2012): 121–31.
Hawkins, E., and A. Jones. “What Is the Role of the Physiotherapist in
Paediatric Intensive Care Units? A Systematic Review of the Evidence
for Respiratory and Rehabilitation Interventions for Mechanically
Ventilated Patients.” Physiotherapy 101, no. 4 (2016): 303–09.
Health Canada. Getting a Grip on Arthritis: A National Primary Health
Care Community Initiative. 2006. www.apps.hc-sc.gc.ca/hcs-sss/
phctf-fassp.nsf/WebProject/0019?OpenDocument&lang=eng&.
—. What Is Primary Health Care? 2006. www.hc-sc.gc.ca/hcs-sss/
delivery-prestation/fptcollab/2003accord/primary-primaire-eng.php.
Health Quality Ontario. “In-Home Care for Optimizing Chronic Disease
Management in the Community: An Evidence-Based Analysis.” Ontario
Health Technology Assessment Series 13, no. 5 (2013): 1–65.
Hebert and others. “Canadian Stroke Best Practice Recommendations:
Stroke Rehabilitation Practice Guidelines, Update 2015.” International
Journal of Stroke 11, no. 4 (2016): 460–84.
Herck, P. V., K. Vanhaecht, S. Deneckere, J. Bellemans, M. Panella,
A. Barbieri, and W. Sermeus. “Key Interventions and Outcomes in
Joint Arhroplasty Clinical Pathways: A Systematic Review.” Journal
of Evaluation in Clinical Practice 16, no. 1 (2010): 39–49.
Hermus, G., C. Stonebridge, and K. Edenhoffer. Future Care for
Canadian Seniors: A Status Quo Forecast. Ottawa: The Conference
Board of Canada, 2015.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 52
© The Conference Board of Canada. All rights reserved. Please contact cboc.ca/ip with questions or concerns about the use of this material.
Appendix A | the Conference Board of Canada
Hill, K. D., S. W. Hunter, F. A. Batchelor, V. Cavalheri, and E. Burton.
“Individualized Home-Based Exercise Programs for Older People to
Reduce Falls and Improve Physical Performance: A Systematic Review
and Meta-analysis.” Maturitas 82, no. 1 (2015): 72–84.
Holdsworth, L., V. Webster, and A. McFayden. “What Are the Costs to
nhS Scotland of Self-Referral to Physiotherapy? Results of a National
Trial.” Physiotherapy 93, no. 1 (2007): 3–11.
Hupperets, M. D., E. A. Verhagen, M. W. Heymans, J. E. Bosmans,
M. W. van Tulder, and W. van Mechelen. “Potential Savings of a
Program to Prevent Ankle Sprain Recurrence: Economic Evaluation
of a Randomized Controlled Trial.” The American Journal of Sports
Medicine 38, no. 11 (2010): 2194–200.
Hussenbux, A., D. Morrissey, C. Joseph, and C. McClellan. “Intermediate
Care Pathways for Musculoskeletal Conditions—Are They Working?
A Systematic Review.” Physiotherapy 101, no. 1 (2015): 13–24.
Institute for Healthcare Improvement. The IHI Triple Aim. 2016.
www.ihi.org/Engage/Initiatives/TripleAim/Pages/default.aspx (accessed
March 1, 2016).
Janssen, I. “Health Care Costs of Physical Inactivity in Canadian Adults.”
Applied Physiology, Nutrition, and Metabolism 37, no. 4 (2012): 803–06.
Javier, F., A. Gómez Conesa, and J. Pérez-López. “Efficacy of Early
Physiotherapy Intervention in Preterm Infant Motor Development.”
Journal of Physical Therapy Science 24, no. 9 (2012): 933–40.
Johnston, K., and K. Grimmer-Somers. “Pulmonary Rehabilitation:
Overwhelming Evidence but Lost in Translation.” Physiotherapy
Canada 62, no. 4 (2010): 368–73.
Jones, R., S. Copper, O. Riley, and F. Dobbs. “A Pilot Study of
Pulmonary Rehabilitation in Primary Care.” The British Journal
of General Practice 52, no. 480 (2002): 567–68.
Jordan, J., M. Holden, E. Mason, and N. Foster. “Interventions to
Improve Adherence to Exercise for Chronic Musculoskeletal Pain in
Adults.” Cochrane Database of Systematic Reviews 1 (2010): 1–64.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 53
The Role of PhysiotheRApy in Canada
Contributing to a Stronger Health Care System
Jordan, R., N. Smith, G. Chahal, C. Casson, M. Reed, and A. Sprowson.
“Enhanced Education and Physiotherapy Before Knee Replacement;
Is It Worth It? A Systematic Review.” Physiotherapy 100, no. 4 (2014):
305–12.
Kamper, S., A. Apeldoorn, A. Chiarotto, R. Smeets, R. Ostelo, J. Guzman,
and M. van Tulder. “Multidisciplinary Biopsychosocial Rehabilitation for
Chronic Low Back Pain.” Cochrane Database of Systematic Reviews 9
(2014): 1–214.
Ko, D.-S., D.-I. Jung, and S.-Y. Bae. “Effect of Lumbar Stabilization
Exercises on the Balance Ability of Patients With Stroke: A Systematic
Review.” Journal of Physical Therapy Science 26, no. 12 (2014):
1993–96.
Kristensen, J., and A. Franklyn-Miller. “Resistance Training in
Musculoskeletal Rehabilitation: A Systematic Review.” British Journal
of Sports Medicine 46, no. 10 (2012): 719–26.
Large, K. E., C. J. Page, K. Brock, M. M. Dowsey, and P. F. Choong.
“Physiotherapy-Led Arthroplasty Review Clinic: A Preliminary Outcomes
Analysis.” Australian Health Review 38, no. 5 (2014): 510–16.
Lawler, P. R., K. B. Filion, and M. J. Eisenberg. “Efficacy of Exercise-
Based Cardiac Rehabilitation Post-Myocardial Infarction: A Systematic
Review and Meta-analysis of Randomized Controlled Trials.” American
Heart Journal 162, no. 4 (2011): 571–84.
Leemrijse, C., I. Swinkles, and C. Veenhof. “Direct Access to Physical
Therapy in the Netherlands: Results From the First Year in Community-
Based Physical Therapy.” Physical Therapy 88, no. 8 (2008): 936–46.
Leppänen, M., S. Aaltonen, J. Parkkari, A. Heinonen, and U. Kujala.
“Interventions to Prevent Sports Related Injuries: A Systematic Review
and Meta-analysis of Randomised Controlled Trials.” Sports Medicine
44, no. 4 (2014): 473–86.
Levy, C. E., E. Silverman, H. Jia, M. Geiss, and D. Omura. “Effects
of Physical Therapy Delivery Via Home Video Telerehabilitation on
Functional and Health-Related Quality of Life Outcomes.” Journal of
Rehabilitation Research and Development 52, no. 3 (2015): 361–70.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 54
© The Conference Board of Canada. All rights reserved. Please contact cboc.ca/ip with questions or concerns about the use of this material.
Appendix A | the Conference Board of Canada
Liu, X.-L., J.-Y. Tan, T. Wang, Q. Zhang, M. Zhang, L.-Q. Yao, and
J.-X. Chen. “Effectiveness of Home-Based Pulmonary Rehabilitation for
Patients With Chronic Obstructive Pulmonary Disease: A Meta-analysis
of Randomized Controlled Trials.” Rehabilitation Nursing 39, no. 1 (2014):
36–59.
Long, A. R., and K. A. Rouster-Stevens. “The Role of Exercise Therapy
in the Management of Juvenile Idiopathic Arthritis.” Current Opinion in
Rheumatology 22, no. 2 (2010): 213–17.
Lorås, H., B. Østerås, T. A. Torstensen, and H. Østerås. “Medical
Exercise Therapy for Treating Musculoskeletal Pain: A Narrative Review
of Results From Randomized Controlled Trials With a Theoretical
Perspective.” Physiotherapy Research International 20, no. 3 (2015):
182–90.
Malak, R., A. Kostiukow, A. Krawczyk-Wasielewska, P. Keczmer,
E. Mojs, K. Głodowska, and W. Samborski. “Dysfunctions Associated
With Dementia and Their Treatment.” Annals of Agricultural and
Environmental Medicine 21, no. 4 (2014): 790–91.
Mansfield, A., J. S. Wong, J. Bryce, S. Knorr, and K. K. Patterson. “Does
Perturbation-Based Balance Training Prevent Falls? Systematic Review
and Meta-analysis of Preliminary Randomized Controlled Trials.” Physical
Therapy 95, no. 5 (2015): 700–9.
Martin, L., R. Baker, and A. Harvey. “A Systematic Review of Common
Physiotherapy Interventions in School-Aged Children With Cerebral
Palsy.” Physical & Occupational Therapy in Pediatrics 30, no. 4 (2010):
294–312.
Meng, X. G., and S. W. Yue. “Efficacy of Aerobic Exercise for Treatment
of Chronic Low Back Pain: A Meta-analysis.” American Journal of
Physical Medicine and Rehabilitation 94, no. 5 (2015): 358–65.
Michaelidis, M., and G. Koumantakis. “Effects of Knee Injury Primary
Prevention Programs on Anterior Cruciate Ligament Injury Rates in
Female Athletes in Different Sports: A Systematic Review.” Physical
Therapy in Sport 15, no. 3 (2014): 200–10.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 55
The Role of PhysiotheRApy in Canada
Contributing to a Stronger Health Care System
Milsom, I., K. S. Coyne, S. Nicholson, M. Kvasz, C. I. Chen, and
A. J. Wein. “Global Prevalence and Economic Burden of Urgency
Urinary Incontinence: A Systematic Review.” European Urology 65,
no. 1 (2014): 79–95.
Mitton, C., and F. Dionne. Valuation of Physiotherapy Services
in Canada. Ottawa: Canadian Physiotherapy Association, 2012.
Morris, J., S. Macgillivray, and S. McFarlane. “Interventions to Promote
Long-Term Participation in Physical Activity After Stroke: A Systematic
Review of the Literature.” Archives of Physical Medicine and
Rehabilitation 95, no. 5 (2014): 956–67.
Munro, D. Healthy People, Healthy Performance, Healthy Profits:
The Case for Business Action on the Socio-Economic Determinants
of Health. Ottawa: The Conference Board of Canada, 2008.
Naci, H., and J. Ioannidis, “Comparative Effectiveness of Exercise and
Drug Interventions on Mortality Outcomes.” The BMJ 347 (2013).
Nagarajan, K., A. Bennett, P. Agostini, and B. Naidu. “Is Preoperative
Physiotherapy/Pulmonary Rehabilitation Beneficial in Lung Resection
Patients?” Interactive Cardiovascular and Thoracic Surgery 13, no. 3
(2011): 300–2.
National Physiotherapy Advisory Group. 2012. Essential Competency
Profile for Physiotherapist Assistants in Canada. http://npag.ca/pdFs/
Joint%20Initiatives/ptA%20profile%202012%20English.pdf.
Nellessen, A., N. Hernandes, and F. Pitta. “Physiotherapy and
Rehabilitative Interventions in Patients With Chronic Respiratory
Diseases: Exercise and Non-Exercise Treatment.” Panminerva
Medica 55, no. 2 (2013): 197–209.
Nogueira, R., B. Weeks, and B. Beck. “Exercise to Improve Pediatric
Bone and Fat: A Systematic Review and Meta-analysis.” Medicine
Science in Sports and Exercise 46, no. 3 (2014): 610–21.
Nordbakke, S., and T. Schwanen. “Well-Being and Mobility: A Theoretical
Framework and Literature Review Focusing on Older People.” Mobilities
9, no. 1 (2014): 104–29.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 56
© The Conference Board of Canada. All rights reserved. Please contact cboc.ca/ip with questions or concerns about the use of this material.
Appendix A | the Conference Board of Canada
Norton, S., F. Matthews, D. Barnes, K. Yaffe, and C. Brayne. “Potential
for Primary Prevention of Alzheimer’s Disease: An Analysis of
Population-Based Data.” The Lancet Neurology 13, no. 8 (2014): 788–94.
Occupational Therapist Assistant and Physiotherapist Assistant
Education Accreditation Program. 2016. Accreditation Process.
www.otapta.ca/english/accreditation/accreditation-process.php
(accessed January 21, 2016).
—. Affiliated Education Programs. 2016. www.otapta.ca/english/
accreditation/affiliated-education-programs.php (accessed January 21,
2016).
Ochmann, U., R. A. Jörres, and D. Nowak. “Long-Term Efficacy of
Pulmonary Rehabilitation: A State-of-the-Art Review.” Journal of
Cardiopulmonary Rehabilitation and Prevention 32, no. 3 (2012): 117–26.
Ontario Physiotherapy Association. 2014. Physiotherapists in Primary
Health Care. https://opa.on.ca/physiotherapy-in-the-health-system/
health-system/ (accessed January 22, 2016).
Ordre professionnel de la physiothérapie du Québec. Section 4 of the
regulation respecting the categories of permits issued by the Ordre
professionnel de la physiothérapie du Québec: Explanatory Guide.
Anjou, QC: Ordre professionnel de la physiothérapie du Québec, 2011.
Peiris, C., N. F. Taylor, and N. Shields. “Extra Physical Therapy Reduces
Patient Length of Stay and Improves Functional Outcomes and Quality
of Life in People With Acute or Subacute Conditions: A Systematic
Review.” Archives of Physical Medicine and Rehabilitation 92, no. 9
(2011): 1490–1500.
Pereira, V. S., A. C. Escobar, and P. Driusso. “Effects of Physical
Therapy in Older Women With Urinary Incontinence: A Systematic
Review.” Revista brasileira de fisioterapia 16, no. 6 (2012): 463–68.
Perracini, M., L. Clemson, A. Tiedmann, S. Kalula, V. Scott, and
C. Sherrington. “Falls in Older Adults: Current Evidence, Gaps, and
Priorities.” Gerontologist (2016), in press.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 57
The Role of PhysiotheRApy in Canada
Contributing to a Stronger Health Care System
Peurala, S., A. H. Karttuunen, T. Sjögren, J. Paltamaa, and A. Heinonen.
“Evidence for the Effectiveness of Walking Training on Walking and
Self-Care After Stroke: A Systematic Review and Meta-analysis of
Randomized Controlled Trials.” Journal of Rehabilitation Medicine 46,
no. 5 (2014): 387–99.
Peytremann-Bridevaux, I., C. Arditi, G. Gex, P. O. Bridevaux, and
B. Burnand. “Chronic Disease Management Programmes for Adults
With Asthma.” Cochrane Database of Systematic Reviews 5 (2015).
Pollock, A., G. Baer, P. Campbell, P. Choo, A. Forster, J. Morris,
V. M. Pomeroy, and P. Langhorne. “Physical Rehabilitation Approaches
for the Recovery of Function and Mobility Following Stroke (Review).”
Cochrane Database of Systematic Reviews 4, (2014): 1–447.
Pollock, A., C. Gray, E. Culham, B. Durward, and P. Langhorne.
“Interventions for Improving Sit-to-Stand Ability Following Stroke
(Review).” Cochrane Database of Systematic Reviews 5 (2014): 1–79.
Pozzi, F., L. Snyder-Mackler, and J. Zeni. “Physical Exercise After Knee
Arthroplasty: A Systematic Review of Controlled Trials.” European
Journal of Physical and Rehabilitation Medicine 49, no. 6 (2013):
877–92.
Prada, G., K. Grimes, and I. Slokin. Defining Health and Health Care
Sustainability. Ottawa: The Conference Board of Canada, 2014.
Price, N., R. Dawood, and S. R. Jackson. “Pelvic Floor Exercise for
Urinary Incontinence: A Systematic Literature Review.” Maturitas 67,
no. 4 (2010): 309–15.
Prince, M., F. Wu, Y. Guo, L. Gutierrez Robledo, M. O’Donnell,
R. Sullivan, and S. Yusuf. “The Burden of Disease in Older People
and Implications for Health Policy and Practice.” The Lancet 385,
no. 9967 (2015): 549–62.
Public Health Agency of Canada. Seniors’ Falls in Canada: Second
Report. 2014. www.phac-aspc.gc.ca/seniors-aines/publications/public/
injury-blessure/seniors_falls-chutes_aines/index-eng.php.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 58
© The Conference Board of Canada. All rights reserved. Please contact cboc.ca/ip with questions or concerns about the use of this material.
Appendix A | the Conference Board of Canada
Richards, M. C., J. J. Ford, S. L. Slater, A. J. Hahne, L. D. Surkitt,
M. Davidson, and J. M. McMeeken. “The Effectiveness of Physiotherapy
Functional Restoration for Post-Acute Low Back Pain: A Systematic
Review.” Manual Therapy 18, no. 1 (2013): 4–25.
Richardson, J., L. Letts, D. Chan, and M. Law. “Rehabilitation in a
Primary Care Setting for Persons With Chronic Illness: A Randomized
Controlled Trial.” Primary Health Care Research & Development 11,
no. 4 (2010): 382–95.
Richardson, J., and others. “Self-Management Interventions for Chronic
Disease: A Systematic Scoping Review.” Clinical Rehabilitation 28,
no. 11 (2014): 1067–77.
Rodrigues, E., A. Gomes, A. Tanhoffer, and N. Leite. “Effects of Exercise
on Pain of Musculoskeletal Disorders: A Systematic Review.” Acta
Ortopédica Brasileira 22, no. 6 (2014): 334–38.
Rubi, M., F. Renom, F. Ramis, M. Medinas, M. J. Centeno, M. Górriz,
E. Crespí, B. Martín, and J. B. Soriano. “Effectiveness of Pulmonary
Rehabilitation in Reducing Health Resources Use in Chronic
Obstructive Pulmonary Disease.” Archives of Physical Medicine
and Rehabilitation 91, no. 3 (2010): 364–68.
Salisbury, C., and others. “Effectiveness of PhysioDirect Telephone
Assessment and Advice Services for Patients With Musculoskeletal
Problems.” British Journal of Sports Medicine 48, no. 18 (2014): 1391.
Sampson, F.C., S. W. Goodacre, and A. O’Cathain. “Interventions
to Improve the Management of Pain in Emergency Departments:
Systematic Review and Narrative Synthesis.” Emergency Medicine
Journal 31 (2014): e9–e18.
Santa Mina, D., H. Clark, P. Ritvo, Y. Leung, A. Matthew, J. Katz,
J. Trachtenberg, and S. Alibhai. “Effect of Total-Body Prehabilitation
on Postoperative Outcomes: A Systematic Review and Meta-analysis.”
Physiotherapy 100, no. 3 (2014): 196–207.
Saunders, D., M. Sanderson, M. Brazzelli, C. Greig, and G. Mead.
“Physical Fitness Training for Stroke Patients.” Cochrane Database
of Systematic Reviews 10 (2013): 1–64.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 59
The Role of PhysiotheRApy in Canada
Contributing to a Stronger Health Care System
Searle, A., M. Spink, A. Ho, and V. Chuter. “Exercise Interventions for
the Treatment of Chronic Low Back Pain: A Systematic Review and
Meta-analysis of Randomised Controlled Trials.” Clinical Rehabilitation
29, no. 12 (2015): 1115–67.
Shen, X., I. S. Wong-Yu, and M. K. Mak. “Effects of Exercise on Falls,
Balance, and Gait Ability in Parkinson’s Disease.” Neurorehabilitation
and Neural Repair 30, no. 6 (2016): 512–27.
Sosnowski, K., F. Lin, M. L. Mitchell, and H. White. “Early Rehabilitation
in the Intensive Care Unit: An Integrative Literature Review.” Australian
Critical Care 28, no. 4 (2015): 216–25.
Specker, B., N. Thiex, and R. G. Sudhagoni. “Does Exercise Influence
Pediatric Bone? A Systematic Review.” Clinical Orthopaedics and
Related Research 473, no. 11 (2015): 3658–72.
Stanley, I., J. Miller, M. Pinnington, G. Rose, and M. Rose. “Uptake
of Prompt Access to Physiotherapy for New Episodes of Back Pain
Presenting in Primary Care.” Physiotherapy 87, no. 2 (2001): 60–67.
Statistics Canada. Canadian Community Health Survey. 2003.
www.statcan.gc.ca/daily-quotidien/040615/dq040615b-eng.htm
(accessed January 20, 2016).
—. Canadian Community Health Survey. 2012. www.statcan.gc.ca/
daily-quotidien/130918/dq130918a-eng.htm.
—. Population Projections for Canada, Provinces and Territories, 2009
to 2036. Cat. No. 91-520-X. 2010. www.statcan.gc.ca/pub/91-520-x/
91-520-x2010001-eng.pdf.
—. CANSIM table 051-0001. Estimates of Population, By Age Group and
Sex for July 1, Canada, Provinces and Territories. www5.statcan.gc.ca/
cansim/a26?id=510001.
Steffens, D., C. G. Maher, L. S. Pereira, M. L. Stevens, V. C. Oliveira,
M. Chapple, L. F. Teixeira-Salmela, and M. J. Hancock. “Prevention of
Low Back Pain: A Systematic Review and Meta-analysis.” JAMA Internal
Medicine 176, no. 2 (2016): 199–208.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 60
© The Conference Board of Canada. All rights reserved. Please contact cboc.ca/ip with questions or concerns about the use of this material.
Appendix A | the Conference Board of Canada
Stiller, K. “Physiotherapy in Intensive Care: An Updated Systematic
Review.” Chest 144, no. 3 (2013): 825–47.
Stoller, O., E. D. Bruin, R. H. Knols, and K. J. Hunt. “Effects of
Cardiovascular Exercise Early After Stroke: Systematic Review
and Meta-analysis.” BMC Neurology 12, no. 45 (2012): 1–16.
Stubbs, B., S. Brefka, and M. D. Denkinger. “What Works to Prevent
Falls in Community-Dwelling Older Adults? Umbrella Review of Meta-
analyses of Randomized Controlled Trials.” Physical Therapy 95, no. 8
(2015): 1095–110.
Stucki, G., A. Cieza, and J. Melvin. “The International Classification
of Functioning, Disability, and Health (ICF): A Unifying Model for the
Conceptual Description of the Rehabilitation Strategy.” Journal of
Rehabilitation Medicine 39 (2015): 279–85.
Tanf, C., N. F. Taylor, and F. C. Blackstock. “Chest Physiotherapy for
Patients Admitted to Hospital With an Acute Exacerbation of Chronic
Obstructive Pulmonary Diseases (Copd): A Systematic Review.”
Physiotherapy 96 (2010): 1–13.
Taylor, N. F., E. Norman, L. Roddy, C. Tang, A. Pagram, and K. Hearn.
“Primary Contact Physiotherapy in Emergency Departments Can Reduce
Length of Stay for Patients With Peripheral Musculoskeletal Injuries
Compared With Secondary Contact Physiotherapy: A Prospective Non-
Randomised Controlled Trial.” Physiotherapy 97, no. 2 (2011): 107–14.
Thiebaud, R. S., M. D. Funk, and T. Abe. “Home-Based Resistance
Training for Older Adults: A Systematic Review.” Geriatrics &
Gerontology International 14, no. 4 (2014): 750–57.
Thomas, M. J., J. Simpson, R. Riley, and E. Grant. “The Impact of
Home-Based Physiotherapy Interventions on Breathlessness During
Activities of Daily Living in Severe Copd: A Systematic Review.”
Physiotherapy 96, no. 2 (2010): 108–19.
Thomas, S., S. Mackintosh, and J. Halbert. “Does the ‘Otago Exercise
Programme’ Reduce Mortality and Falls in Older Adults?: A Systematic
Review and Meta-analysis.” Age and Ageing 39, no. 6 (2010): 681–87.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 61
The Role of PhysiotheRApy in Canada
Contributing to a Stronger Health Care System
Tofthagen, C., C. Visovsky, and D. Berry. “Strength and Balance Training
for Adults With Peripheral Neuropathy and High Risk of Fall: Current
Evidence and Implications for Future Research.” Oncology Nursing
Forum 39, no. 5 (2012): E416–24.
Tomlinson, C., and others. “Physiotherapy for Parkinson’s Disease:
A Comparison of Techniques (Review).” Cochrane Database of
Systematic Reviews 6 (2014): 1–121.
Tomlinson, C., and others. “Physiotherapy Versus Placebo or No
Intervention in Parkinson’s Disease.” Cochrane Database of Systematic
Reviews 8 (2012): 1–103.
Toomey, E., L. Currie-Murphy, J. Matthews, and D. A. Hurley. “The
Effectiveness of Physiotherapist-Delivered Group Education and
Exercise Interventions to Promote Self-Management for People With
Osteoarthritis and Chronic Low Back Pain: A Rapid Review Part I.”
Manual Therapy 20, no. 2 (2015): 265–86.
van Benten, E., J. Pool, J. Mens, and A. Pool-Goudzwaard.
“Recommendations for Physical Therapists on the Treatment of
Lumbopelvic Pain During Pregnancy: A Systematic Review.” The Journal
of Orthopaedic and Sports Physical Therapy 44, no. 7 (2014): 464–73.
van Doorn, N. “Exercise Programs for Children With Cystic Fibrosis:
A Systematic Review of Randomized Controlled Trials.” Disability and
Rehabilitation 32, no. 1 (2010): 41–9.
van Oort, L., J. Mutsaers, S. Lakke, and A. Verhagen. “Physiotherapy
or Multidisciplinary Treatment for Chronic Low Back Pain? A Systematic
Review.” Nederlands Tijdschrift voor Fysiotherapie 119, no. 5 (2009):
153–60.
Vera-Garcia, E., F. Mayoral-Cleries, D. Vancampfort, B. Stubbs, and
A. I. Cuesta-Vargas. “A Systematic Review of the Benefits of Physical
Therapy Within a Multidisciplinary Care Approach for People With
Schizophrenia: An Update.” Psychiatry Research 229, no. 3 (2015):
828–39.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 62
© The Conference Board of Canada. All rights reserved. Please contact cboc.ca/ip with questions or concerns about the use of this material.
Appendix A | the Conference Board of Canada
Verbeeten, D., P. Astles, and G. Prada. Understanding Health and Social
Services for Seniors in Canada. Ottawa: The Conference Board of
Canada, 2015.
Wearing, J., S. Beaumont, D. Forbes, B. Brown, and R. Engel. “The
Use of Spinal Manipulative Therapy in the Management of Chronic
Obstructive Pulmonary Disease: A Systematic Review.” Journal of
Alternative and Complementary Medicine 22, no. 2 (2016): 108–14.
Wieczorek, B., C. Burke, A. Al-Harbi, and S. R. Kudchadkar. “Early
Mobilization in the Pediatric Intensive Care Unit: A Systematic Review.”
Journal of Pediatric Intensive Care (2015): 129–70.
World Health Organization. World Report on Ageing and Health.
Geneva: World Health Organization, 2014.
You, L., G. Sadler, S. Majumdar, D. Burnett, and C. Evans.
“Physiotherapists’ Perceptions of Their Role in the Rehabilitation
Management of Individuals With Obesity.” Physiotherapy Canada 64, no.
2 (2012): 168–75.
Yuan, H., B. Williams, and M. Liu. “Attitudes Toward Urinary Incontinence
Among Community Nurses and Community-Dwelling Older People.”
Journal of Wound, Ostomy and Continence Nursing 38, no. 2 (2011):
184–89.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 63
The Role of PhysiotheRApy in Canada
Contributing to a Stronger Health Care System
APPENDIX B
Methodology
Table 1
Database Search Strategy
Step Search (MeSH, keywords, combined selections)
1Physical Therapy Modalities / or physiotherapy.mp
2Physical Therapists
3 1 or 2
4Primary Health Care
5 Aged / or Senior Centers / or “Aged, 80 and over”
6 Long-Term Care
7 “Physical and Rehabilitation Medicine” / or Rehabilitation Nursing / or Rehabilitation
Centers / or Rehabilitation
8 3 and 4
9 3 and 5
10 3 and 6
11 3 and 7
12 8 or 9 or 10 or 11
13 limit 12 to (english language and humans)
14 limit 13 to yr = “2010–Current”
15 limit 14 to abstracts
16 limit 15 to “review articles”
Source: The Conference Board of Canada.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 64
© The Conference Board of Canada. All rights reserved. Please contact cboc.ca/ip with questions or concerns about the use of this material.
Appendix B | the Conference Board of Canada
Table 2
Canadian Physiotherapy Scope of Practice
Skill/Activity BC AB SK MB ON QC NB NS PE NL YT NT
Skill acquisition:
Assess physical function A A A A A A A A A A A A
Assess neuromusculoskeletal and cardiorespiratory systems A A A A A A A A A A A A
Treat as autonomous clinicians A A A A A A A A A A A A
Therapeutic exercise programs A A A A A A A A A A A A
Hydrotherapy; electrotherapy; and use of mechanical, radiant,
or thermal energy
A A A A A A A A A A A A
Soft tissue and manual therapy, including massage and pnF A A A A A A A A A A A A
Treating a wound by cleansing, soaking, irrigating, probing,
deriding, packing, or dressing
R* A A A R A* A* A A* A* A UNK
*Exceptions:
•
BC—No debridement
•
•
QC—May apply topical medication
NB, pe, NL—Silent
Pelvic floor dysfunction—putting an instrument, hand,
or finger beyond the labia majora or anal verge
A A A* A R A A A A* A* A* UNK
*Exceptions:
•
SK—With consent
•
•
•
NL—Silent
pe—If competency met, silent
yt—With special endorsement
Acupuncture A R A A R UNA A A A A A UNK
•
•
•
•
•
•
•
•
BC—Approved programs
AB—Five approved programs and roster enrolment
NS—Pain relief
yt—No restrictions
MB—Use by approved program
NB—AFC or equivalent, included on a roster, and limited to within physiotherapy practice
pe—AFC or equivalent and college endorsement
SK—AFC or equivalent, pts restrictions
Dry needling R A A R A* A A A* A A
•
•
*QC—With approved programs
*pe—Evidence of competency
Intramuscular stimulation UNK R ? ? R UNK UNK UNK UNK UNK UNK UNK
Spinal manipulation A R A A R A A A UNK A A UNK
•
•
•
•
•
NS—No restrictions
yt—No restrictions
MB—By approved program, within skill level, and within college competency statement
SK—Undergrad teachings or post-grad courses from Orthopaedic Division
QC—With approval from college
Tracheal suctioning A A A A R A A A A A A A
•
Endotracheal and nasopharyngeal
Introduce an instrument past the pharynx or nasal passages A
(continued …)
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 65
The Role of PhysiotheRApy in Canada
Contributing to a Stronger Health Care System
Table 2 (cont’d)
Canadian Physiotherapy Scope of Practice
Skill/Activity BC AB SK MB ON QC NB NS PE NL YT NT
Administration by inhalation: oxygen, drug, or substance by
health professional with authority
A UNK A A A UNA A A A R R UNK
*Exceptions:
•
NB and pe—Silent
•
•
•
•
•
BC*—Anticipated legislative reform
AB—Legislation silent
MB—Only oxygen, not applicable when adjustment of flow during et suctioning or with unstable patients
NL—Oxygen only and with training
yt—Physiotherapy-related medications prescribed by physician, oxygen unknown
Setting/casting a fracture or dislocationD UNA UNA UNA UNA UNA A? UNA UNA UNA UNA UNK
Reduction of a joint A A
Administration of medications prescribed by physicians A A
Test requisitions:
Ordering MRI or diagnostic ultrasound R R* UNA UNA R* R* A* UNA UNA UNA UNA UNK
*Exceptions:
•
•
NB—Silent
•
•
on—Legislation passed, not yet proclaimed, not yet permitted
AB—Diagnostic ultrasound included in new legislation
QC—Sound waves, not MRI or X-ray
Ordering x-rays RD* R* R*
•
•
•
on—New legislation passed—not yet proclaimed, not yet permitted
NS—Anticipated reform
MB—Delegated act, restricted to MSK and no interpretation
Ordering lab tests UNA UNK* UNAD R* UNA A* UNA UNA UNA UNA UNK
*Exceptions:
•
•
NB—Silent
•
•
MB—Under delegation from geriatricians only, not general pts
AB—Silent
on—Not yet proclaimed, not yet permitted
Ordering electricity for EMG or nerve conduction UNK UNK UNK UNK UNA UNK A UNK UNK UNK UNK UNK
Prescriptions:
Prescription, manufacture, modification, and application of
braces, splints, taping, mobility aids, or seating equipment
UNK UNK UNK UNK UNK UNK UNK A UNK UNK A UNK
Ergonomic evaluation, modification, education,
and counselling
UNK UNK UNK UNK UNK UNK UNK A UNK UNK A UNK
Professional referrals:
Professional development:
Communicating a diagnosis identifying a physical dysfunction,
disease, or disorder as the cause of a person’s symptoms
A A A A A UNA A A A A A UNK
Direct access, private practice A A A A A A A A A A A A
Direct access, public facility A UNK UNK UNK UNK UNK UNK UNK UNK UNK UNK UNK
Note: A = authorized act; D = delegated act; R = restricted/controlled act; UNA = unauthorized act; UNK = unknown.
Source: Canadian Physiotherapy Association, 2012.
Find Conference Board research at www.e-library.ca. 66
© The Conference Board of Canada. All rights reserved. Please contact cboc.ca/ip with questions or concerns about the use of this material.
•
•
•
•
•
•
•
About The Conference Board of Canada
We are:
The foremost independent, not-for-profit, applied research organization
in Canada.
Objective and non-partisan. We do not lobby for specific interests.
Funded exclusively through the fees we charge for services to the
private and public sectors.
Experts in running conferences but also at conducting, publishing,
and disseminating research; helping people network; developing individual
leadership skills; and building organizational capacity.
Specialists in economic trends, as well as organizational performance and
public policy issues.
Not a government department or agency, although we are often hired to provide
services for all levels of government.
Independent from, but affiliated with, The Conference Board, Inc. of New York,
which serves nearly 2,000 companies in 60 nations and has offices in Brussels
and Hong Kong.
Insights. Understanding. Impact.
255 Smyth Road, Ottawa on
K1H 8M7 Canada
Tel. 613-526-3280
Fax 613-526-4857
Inquiries 1-866-711-2262
conferenceboard.ca
PUBLICAtion 8648 | 8659
PRICE: Complimentary